Some of the feedback from the last expo (2009) wasn’t exactly positive, but it shouldn’t have put people off.
This is why personas should not be conceptual communications straightjackets, and ‘influencer outreach’ should not be relied on to connect and resonate with audiences. Rather, opening channels for people to speak for themselves is the central task for social marketers, whose ultimate role is acting as human conduit between social businesses (and organisations) and active, informed prosumers.
Organizers say they hope the coordinated events will mark a spring resurgence of the movement after a quiet winter. Calls for a general strike with no work, no school, no banking and no shopping have sprung up on websites in Toronto, Barcelona, London, Kuala Lumpur and Sydney, among hundreds of cities in North America, Europe and Asia.
Now ready your cup thingies. Spoon the batter into the cups backwards, starting with purple.
Foundationed deep, somehow
I am finding my greatness. It’s different than I thought and not about being better than anyone else. It’s polishing those stones and appreciating their facets.
The heroine leaned hard to one side, looked down. “Hm.”
I hope you'll take a peek if you find yourself in the bookstore or drop me a note if you are a subscriber. I can't wait to sit down later this evening with a glass of wine and take the whole issue in page by page. Thank you for supporting me, for suggesting I submit my work and for following this blog. I would have never thought to submit work for publication before I started this blog. You've inspired me, encouraged me and opened doors for me my friends....thank you for sharing this special moment too. xoxo
The painfully slow, ploddingly average presence of Charlie Adam should be chalked down to experience. The Scot should be sold to any if any realistic bids are received. Downing’s sale wouldn’t occasion many protests either and the likes of Dirk Kuyt have already been informed that their contracts will not be renewed.
We need to remember that the health of our Spirit is that health that will sustain the physical, emotional and mental one. We need to exercise our spiritual self through the word of God, through constant communication with Him and following His ways. We do not need to make a great, long, scary plan for it. One day at the time…Amen!
The rest of the weekend I will be working on laminating and inserting all of my current charts and spreadsheets that I am going to centralize into the binder!
(13) Nancy Smith
As Emily gets older, I’m making an effort to make those memories with her. I know how quickly these days and years pass. Even though our family only includes Emily and me most of the time and looks very different from the two-parent, multiple-child family I used to have, it’s what I have and I am grateful!
Did achieving your first book deal change the way you approach your writing?
Many are happy to dismiss them as fakes and just as many believe they are real and many people believe those people...
Flip by Martyn Bedford. Some brilliant insights in this books about a boy who wakes up in another boy's body - I esepcially enjoyed the moment when he first takes a pee using someone else's equipment. It would have been easy to play it for laughs, but Martyn Bedford turns it into a moving story which examines the very basics of who we are.
Some go as far as saying that those who do not make money to live modestly should pay income taxes, even if it means starving.
Yet even if they lose the presidency on Election Day they’re still likely to be in charge of at least one house of Congress as well as several state legislators and governorships. That’s a problem for the nation.
China has a long way to go when it comes in granting equal rights to transgendered persons.
Patrick:"I'll draw you a map."
For laymen, are all women thus array'd.
us an example to follow of how to live victoriously on the earth. His
Just to have a change from the Apothecary Art cards I have copied this card from Deb Fearns to showcase the Berry Blossom designer series paper.
4. Yet another was a kind of Star Trek pastiche - essentially “the Doctor on board the Enterprise, puncturing all that Starfleet pomposity with this sheer Doctor-ness”.
I wrote about it at the time, calling it the day the music died. This was just to spin some song lyrics into the title of the post, but it certainly marked the moment when I realised that the whole musical scene had changed. To my shame, I'm not even sure when the fateful day was. I used to visit regularly, taking an hour or so to flick through the extensive collection of second hand CDs, or more excitingly, the dirt cheap pre-release discs sold on to them by music industry insiders. My visits got further and further apart until one day I wandered along the Rue Linné and found the shop closed. A few months later I passed by again and saw that it had become a Subway unit. From take-away discs to take-away sandwiches. Real food for thought.
10. Hey Little Rich Girl
But I had not yet reached that when Bolero came along.
I'm counting down the days.
Party Time interrupted, nodding and humming sagely in agreement.
I babysit Joe and Jack every week. But for the past two weeks, they have been on vacation or I have been on vacation. Finally yesterday I got to babysit them again!
I finished hair dressing school, getting myself more in debt.
But Jimmy didn't forget.
Eric and Marci joined us after they did more exploring of the city. I could tell the two of them had a blooming friendship on the go, although I doubt it had anything to do with a romance. In fact, I was beginning to wonder if Eric was “in the closet,” so to say.
Turns out there are things you can do. Granted, they are not a guarantee, but doing nothing clearly shouldn’t be an option either. I’m learning as much as I can about prevention because the same things that prevent breast cancer from occurring in the first place will also help keep it at bay once you’ve had it…because I want to prevent my children from ever having to face what I am facing now.
Missing out on the Main Courses, however, is not so much of a hardship at Perbacco, a lesson I learnt early on when I was turned off by a supposed celeriac puree that tasted, instead, like potato and a shameful celery salad, made from the root, where juliennes of the vegetable were soft instead of crispy, withered, brown around the edges and tasteless. Not even the accompanying Beef Short Rib Stracatto, despite being flavoursome and tender, could save the dish from its shortcomings at the time.
For dinner, Al roasted a chicken with lemons and onions and I made roasted asparagus and buttered noodles with ciabatta bread. He makes the bestest chicken! And the best part is we have leftovers for tomorrow. We enjoyed our evening inside watching some TV and falling asleep on the couch.
Senior Night is this Wednesday, and it's a great opportunity to celebrate one of the best point guards GW's had in a long time, Tony Taylor. Do-it-all forward Aaron Ware is also a senior, as is big man Jabari Edwards and walk-on Michael Conward.
Illinois farmer Doug Martin said the report gets the year going for farmers.
1 c. boiling water
In a small, heavy bottomed sauce pan heat the sugar on medium heat, stirring constantly. Continue stirring until the sugar dissolves and reaches a golden amber color. Add the pecans and quickly stir to coat and then transfer to the lined tray. Spread the nuts out (I like to keep some of them in clumps, but you can spread them out thinner if you’d like) let cool.
flashes of lightning!
“His smirk.”
1.Run a line of moderately longer stitches all the way around the sleeve at exactly 5/8".
check out this pick. Isn't it pretty? I took it last year on the way to my Aunt's funeral. It's so pretty by the mountains.
One of my favorite shows: How I Met Your Mother. I watched loads of TV as a kid but as I got older I began to think of it as a distraction. I couldn’t help but feel guilty when I sat down to watch it. I couldn’t relax and would find something that I thought was more productive to do. Nonsense.
The feeling in my heart
Welcome to my Earth Day Blog post. I have the extreme pleasure of being part of Leslie Rahye's Earth day Blog Hop. She is kind enough to make a link where we can't get lost along the hop. Just click on the next designer and hop in any order you like.
It is fun to watch how the Lord brings together each individual for these trips. We advertise the trips each year for our church to participate, but God is always doing a work behind the scenes to get them to that place of going on THIS trip. God’s perfect timing and orchestrating is what will make the right team and I can see His hand in this already. I hear from these people that they are moved by God’s compassion “to make a difference”; i hear a passion for Africa in some of their voices that has stirred for a while; i hear about families who want their kids to know what it’s like to serve together and to be stretched beyond their western, predominantly white, upper/middle-class experience; i hear about people who have read books that have challenged them to think more seriously about missions or books like HOLE IN OUR GOSPEL that has forced them to not ignore the poverty issue, or books like RADICAL that challenge them to rethink their idea of the American dream as a Christ-follower; i hear about people who are on these trips who are just simply going out of a sense of “obedience” because of God’s prompting…these are the people that make up our team and it’s going to be fun to get to know them. These are people who are GOING to serve the Lord in a way none of them have done before. I love watching God orchestrate people and events…this is one of those things. Small, but significant.
Originally I wanted to end on an up note, and have the revolution cause so much trouble that the Narren leave. But now I don’t think that’s realistic–it’s just a convention of the alien invader trope–and also I don’t want that anymore because I have a story I want to include as part of this, one that happens a generation later, when the Narren are in full swing stripping the forests and the oceans, and the collaborators have a lifestyle that our own generation could only dream about–jacked in to a group mind that spans star systems, that is in every way a galactic empire. While the have-nots are scavenging the remains of the cities for the makings of moonshine meth, and holding flea markets, and trying to find a way to live in the shadow of the past.
taking a $100 pledge!
I began reeling. The info I'd stored from the day before collided with what he'd just shared and I immediately jumped to the conclusion that something terrible was about to happen to us. The more I thought about it, the more rational my thought process seemed. Emotions took over even as I tried to tell myself that I could be completely wrong. Soon enough my anxiety was over the top. I know what he expects of me in these situations. He wants me to call and he doesn't care that it's the middle of his workday.
Nothing stays the same, right? Imagine what happened when I decided to randomly view some old blog posts and had it hit me in the face how true that is!
I don't really know how to wrap this up, except to say to anyone who might be inclined, PLEASE DON'T DESTROY THE NEW TREES!
~ I'm going to go to bed now. Good night.
On the people I used to
Cheri Pinktrix! Congratulations Cheri, please drop me a line at your_zombie_sweetheart (at) hotmail.co.uk to let me know your address and choice of trim colour and I will send your fascinator off on its journey to Canada!
I am not most people..........
32. Do you think too much or too little? Too much
I found out about the book from "The Brewers' Journal" for 1940, which contains a review of it. You can probably guess what followed. I did a search in Abebooks and located a copy. (And there was only one, so bad luck if you'd like your own copy.)
Remember to follow the B theme,
Michael Devine is a very talented textile designer from New York who specializes in hand printed fabrics. He also runs a successful textile company and an on line store called “Michael Devine Home.”
I got to take yesterday off work because I've been working so many extra hours and because next week I'll be working a ton more! It was a nice day to be out searching for treasures!! Kevin was off too, but he decided to stay home. Which was fine by me-I like to be able to take as much time as I like or as little time as I like. Sometimes he gets tired of waiting, or sometimes I get tired of waiting on him!
I have got to get this blogging thing together. How many times have I said this? I started a post about Random Acts of Kindness Week because I thought it was such a neat concept. Then, I got busy at work, was really tired when I got home and ended up not writing anything. RAOC ended like two weeks ago, so it’s not even relevant anymore. Ugh!
Unlike any other medical condition, symptoms of severe mental illness create many obstacles that must be overcome for patients to become enabled, empowered, and engaged. Overcoming these obstacles and establishing provider-patient partnership has the potential to improve treatment results and possibly help reduce health care costs, crime rates, recidivism, and homelessness. [3]
“Oooof. Stop Stop! Ms. Rajdhani Express!”
First up, a page about our lovely Dasha. She loved the snow so much.
Despite recently winning two medals at the Australian International Beer Awards—a silver for Modus Hoperandi, and a bronze for ESB, out of 1195 total entries—Thibodeau remained strangely focused on the loss. The medals in Australia weren’t the only recent wins, either, with Ska winning a silver medal at the Denver International Beer Competition for Buster Nut Brown Ale, and a two medals at the North American Beer Awards—a gold for Pinstripe and a bronze for Steel Toe Stout.
We, meaning my youngest two and I. My mother informs me there has been some confusion among my older siblings, wondering why I have been doing such elementary projects with all the children. Generally, if I say the younger children, I'm referring to my 6 and 7 year olds, and not my 13 or 14 year olds. T, would like me to be clear, that he has not been chasing ladybugs, planting fairy gardens, or reading any of the books below - not that he couldn't learn a thing or two from the illustrations in Jack's Garden, they are very detailed and informative, and even I spent quite a bit of time looking them over.
AK: What a personal question! I have a European-size refrigerator in my kitchen: it opens up the space, and it also means I shop every day for fresh food. Yesterday there was nothing in it because I’d been on a book tour for a week. But last night a friend came over with salmon and new potatoes, fresh spinach, and a mixed fruit pie from the orchard market. And today it’s nearly empty again!
In GRAMMAR CANDY, the second book by educator Katrina Streza, Danny and Sam are back for another candy-filled learning adventure.
And I think we all know that it just isn’t easy.
Scientists and humans often make mistakes when labeling a species extinct. For example, for years scientists told us Coelacanth (a fish) was extinct only to find out in the 1930’s that is was alive and thriving. This could be the case with the dinosaur.
Destroyed. Seriously... scenes from WWI.
“I am verily a man which am a Jew, born in Tarsus, a city of Cilicia, yet brought up in this city at the feet of Gamaliel, and taught according to the perfect manner of the law of the fathers, and was zealous towards God, as ye all are this day.”
Canon Power Shot SX20 IS Professional Camera
“I’m sure I shall find an excellent use for it,” I said to the girls.
Cook for 10 minutes, until just barely beginning to brown. Let rest for a minute on the pan before removing them to cool on a rack.
No giant Christmas trees. No caroling off-key. No yards decorated with power-draining life-size Santas. No baking until my thighs look like two enormous tubes of cookie dough. Worst of all—no family. It was bound to happen. Le sigh.
And we will still do it.
No one ever asked me if it was ok with me to get pregnant out of wedlock. If I was strong enough to handle it. Did I even think this could happen.
"I guess I better go," he said solemnly.
How they sweep over buildings and cascade down fences and retaining walls, spilling their beautiful flowers into the road for all to enjoy... Living in Florida I have come to see them often, and in many different colors, ranging from hot pink to coral to white. I have also come to learn that they are thorny and need a lot of pruning to look good :)
Recipe image
Now I’m right back where I was when we left… DOING LAUNDRY!
You’ll notice the very strong naming conventions that cut down on how many variables you need to initialize. Naming conventions are your friend. They can automate an enormous amount of grunt work.
Today I am going to share with you the tip-top secret trick that everyone who’s driving around a pristine automobile knows. Here it is. Get ready. They take out what goes in. That’s it, that’s the secret.
I'm detouring down the baby aisle again......
News has been received here of the death of Mr. Norman Campbell at his home near Morven yesterday after an illness of several weeks. Mr. Campbell was the oldest man in the county, being 96 years old and was prominent in the history of the county from the days of the earliest settlers. He was of Scotch descent and was a man of wonderfully fine character. No man ever lived in the county who was more generally beloved and esteemed and in his late years he has been surrounded by the tender care and veneration of friends and family. He retained his strength and faculties to a remarkable degree almost to the end of his long life.
Easter place cards
** “The proposition that the Earth is not the center of the world and immovable but that it moves, and also with a diurnal motion, is equally absurd and false philosophically…”
Police Oppression
1 jar (16 oz.) Thick 'N Chunky Salsa
Have a wonderful week-
Those who have enjoyed any of these three elements in isolation will only be able to imagine the result of a collaboration of this calibre. To fully appreciate the fun and entertainment available you really will need to be there on the night. With a venue that is a mere stagger from public transport options and the promise of some very special beer offerings and the Prof’s famous Beer Trivia and talent for finding the humour in every situation what more encouragement do you really need?
E. Wenzel
03. A song for jeffrey
It was interesting, and surprisingly, I liked the music. Kind of. Only because it was different. And catchy. But the whole time, I was half expecting Herbie Hancock to come along and break out “Rock It”.
The picture at the top of this article is of one of the victims of South Africa's "Farm Murders"
perform a more efficient, effective examination.
I had to squeeze into a barely big enough gap between
Thankfully, my expanding trail of wordy thought is broken by Christine tugging on me hand and pointing out over the park with her free one. "Hey Green. Do you know that bloke down there?"
Too bad my left arm is pretty much useless to me. Not only do I not know who I would have to give my left arm to to get my iced coffee, it probably wouldn’t do them much good either. Unless they wanted to used it as a back scratcher, but then it’d have to be all rigamortis and scratching your back with someone’s petrified hand is a bit disturbing, unless your last name is Munster or Adams. And hey, don’t the Munster’s live in Waxahachie? I’m so going the wrong way in that case. Maybe I should turn around. If only there were the guarantee of a WAWA iced coffee, but there’s not because there’s definitely not a WAWA there. Gah I’d give my left arm for an iced coffee. (Kristen isn’t that why you were thinking about the Munster’s in the first place?) Riiiiggghhht. Because my left arm is totally useless to society, unless someone needs a back scratcher, or maybe a jewelry stand. How sick would that be as a Halloween prop? And by sick I literally mean sick. I guess you could probably use it as a dog training devise as well. Like a news paper. Instead of swatting the dog on the nose with your hand, they could use mine. Or it could be used for fetch. And wasn’t Anna Lee always talking about wanting a TRex/baby arm in her chest. Heck, if she’d get me a WAWA iced coffee she could have my left arm, but that’d probably be an expensive surgery and I think my arm would probably be too big. How big were TRex arms anyway?
coarse sea salt (to present)
I wonder what it was like to be part of one of those fearless generations who lived at a time when we didn’t know the sun could kill you.
Tomorrow night’s home game against Besiktas will see Upson back in defence with late fitness checks on Wilson, Etherington and Wilkinson. Diego Arismendi will also be involved possibly even starting.
In the opening chapter of OCULUS, I speak of Jordan's S.A.T. scores. He got a perfect score in math. But his other two areas were average. What gets him in are his hockey laurels. He gets a "likely" letter from the coach of the Cornell team and it is the coach who gets him qualified for a need-based scholarship (the only kind the Ivies have--they do not offer athletic scholarships).
Row 18: Knit 1 stitch, purl across the row, knit last stitch.
If you’re worried if the timing is a little late as the Wii is in its twilight hours, Square Enix is going to also release a Wii U version (*the Wii U is coming out at the end of 2012), meaning the online servers will continue for quite a while.
In a hurry, I managed to get my glasses and still through the kitchen window (between the smears and the spots on the glass) I could see - Oh, no! It is certainly NOT a wood pecker!
Analysis: I'm by far not a fan of science fiction. Show me any book that has anything to do with aliens and you can pretty much bet that it'll end up being passed over. However, there is something that drew me to Invasion (I have to admit it was the pretty color combination and errie vibe I got from the book that pulled me in). Luckily, I'm glad that I was able to read Invasion as it was a fun, quick read.
It's warm and very windy today. Oh, and our air conditioner went out last night...hum...what else?
B5 Oregon
You already know about my busy weekend so I won't be around until it is over as my craft area is also our spare room and with company over for three nights, that means I don't get to stamp...the upside, I can spend some time reading the Hunger Games trilogy :)
Thanks to my neighbor, Yvette, I was able to photograph an eastern box turtle today! She found him on her patio and gave him water while she waited for me to arrive. Our guess is that he was searching for water. Rainfall has been scarce this spring and judging from the turtle’s eager approach to the water, he was thirsty.
As concerned, intelligent home educators, we all put a lot of time and effort into choosing the tools and supplements we feel will best enable us to teach our children. We worry and fret over our educational philosophy, our curriculum, our homeschool space, our schedule and our extracurricular activities.
the barbie princess castle.
Utopians is a garage rock band led by singer Barbi Recanati. They usually sound like a wild rampage of 70s-like guitar riffs and distortions, especially on their new album Freak. This song is the exception - an intimate acoustic ballad with Spanish lyrics inspired by a cartoon character.
Nash and Sting come out, and for the record, Sting is back to the black and white paint color, which is a good thing.
A pillar of pink light reaches into the sky and spreads across the entire world as it snows. Why does it need to snow? Because that’s how you know it’s meaningful! Also fuck you.
And so we clung to you
Imaginarium Designs chipboard – leaf
By the end of the ride I was sitting at 45 minutes and covered 11 miles averaging slightly under 15 mph according to my Nexercise iPhone app. My transition time was very quick as it consisted of jumping off the bike in my own driveway, grabbing my water bottle and setting off at a trot and immediately noticed that it sure felt funny starting out…
Kind of.
I found a little bee in my stash (from a Cricut cartridge) that was perfect for what I had in mind... I used lots of foam tape and pop dots because I love dimension and had fun creating a little flower field with my 1/2 inch circle punch... ;-) And of course I had to use a tiny bit of Trendy Twine... ;-)
But then you hop over to her website, and suddenly all of her nice comments take on a very sticky, frosting-y sort of flavor and you start licking your fingers wishing she was coming over for tea. Right. Now.
This article is a summary of Kersten’s exhaustive research into Christ’s travels after the Crucifixion, his arrival in India with the Mother Mary and finally his death and entombment in Kashmir.
these past
CLEANING RAGS
just when you think she's yours
They told me the big black Lab’s name was Reggie as I looked at him lying in his pen. the shelter was clean, no-kill, and the people really friendly. I’d only been in the area for six months, but everywhere I went in the small college town, people were welcoming and open. Everyone waves when you pass them on the street.
PlumTuckered - 70
Top new products on the market from melt-proof makeup to must-have hair care products. These amazing items will keep you looking pretty and polished all summer long. Go to WhoWhatWear.com.
1.In the bowl of a standing mixer, add the shortening and brown sugar. Mix on medium speed until smooth.
This experience made me wonder about something. I've often wondered what happened to the person who was running that gig. Was he the real deal and did he just get in over his head? Or was this some kind of a James Ford thingamabob? A long con? I will never know. I CAN never know.
Another simple dish to make, which we left baking while we ate dinner.
Elohim Elohim on kaon koan and baryons
Immunology in a gay bar does not extend to the heart and cannot prevent a guest or an MD from getting hurt. Even when love is not present, it does not mean pain will not be part of the equation.
"Sweet?" Jessica suggested. "Generous?"
And so we come to The Avengers (or the horrible title it’s being called in some territories, Avengers Assemble). Legendary comic book writer Josh Whedon was brought in by Marvel to direct, and the majority of the lead cast returning with the exception of Edward Norton, who it was revealed at the 2010 comic-con converntion would be replaced by actor Mark Ruffalo. Ruffalo will also be the first actor in the history of the Hulk to play both David Banner and via motion capture also portray the Hulk. The characters of Erik Selvig and Pepper Potts have also been shown to be returning in trailers and released images, but this is expected to be in small cameo appearances.
PS ive been posting more often this last week but probably won't again for another couple weeks since i have EOC exams next week and i have to work really hard.... so feel free to comment and check out the other posts as well. i always love to read a comment :)
The addition of specially created ‘silk’ tea pouches extends Tea Guys modernization in that it offers a product that keeps true to the sensory and aesthetic experience of their loose leaf blends. Our research and development department is continually creating customer-oriented, functional, and attractive products.
But then something interesting starts happening.
Following the whimsical style of Buffy: The Vampire Slayer, Whedon’s contrast of regular life with mystical portentousness strikes a resounding harmony in CitW. In one scene, a creepy harbinger named Mordecai sermonizes in ominous tones about impending death until realizing that he’s being made fun of on speakerphone. CitW is peppered with hilarious moments like these, where Sitterson and Hadley (the facility technicians) guide the film’s mood by reacting to horror with nonchalance, self-entitlement, or cheekiness. In turn, their reactions mock those of a typical horror film audience.
We were still feeling the buzz from the shots we had earlier, when this statuesque redhead with a pixie cut, hoop earrings, and a black catsuit strutted up to me, and said, "I think you're sexy. I want to take you home and f*ck all night long."
Me and Ady did the doll lunch at the American Girl Cafe, it was fun and cute and Ad was in heaven.
Thanks again, Ms. Hawk, for all of this great information. Your passion for your clients’ work is wonderfully apparent. That is what we’re all looking for, after all--an agent who is as passionate about our writing as we are.
A friend of mine asked me to knit a Jayne Cobb Hat. For those of you unfamiliar with Jayne Cobb (as was I), it is a character from the tv show Firefly. I found a pattern on the blog Knitting Ninja (which is an awesome name for a blog).
I attached some Baker's twine to the back, added some foam tape to the back, and adhered it, using my two-way glue pen to attach the twine to the card base.
I’m not changing.
how much stovewood in one
My son Zachariah was only 21 months old when we lost Yasminah, but it still astounds me to this day what he remembers and the questions he asks.
Today's Contest:
On the weekend we went for a drive down south of Sydney, through the national park heading towards the new Sea Cliff Bridge.... well it is a couple of years old now but I have been meaning to go down and try it out.
Dennis Etchison – When They Gave Us Memory
Tetraplegia is usually irreversible but not terminal. Diabetes is ‘irrecoverable’ without treatment but not ‘irreversible’ with it. Leukemia is ‘terminal’ but not irrecoverable if managed properly. And literally hundreds of thousands of British people suffer from conditions like rheumatoid arthritis, Parkinson’s disease, multiple sclerosis and chronic bronchitis which are ‘irrecoverable’ but partly reversible and not terminal.
Or maybe not. That's how health problems roll.
"I'd like to speak to a customer service person in the United Kingdom."
For some clarification, check out this verse from 1 Peter:
While visiting London my family stayed at The Haymarket hotel http://www.firmdale.com/ , designed and owned by Kit Kemp. LOVED IT! What a fabulous place with the most amazing design ideas. The whole experience got me thinking about adding some color to my somewhat neutral home. In the past, when I’ve added anything of substance I get squeamish. I love neutral. I love white, but I also love punches of color in the right places. So, I’ve decided to take it one step at a time as I enter the world of color.
Hope everyone had good holidays and that you have a great 2012.
The challenge to us. Do we do the same in focussing on the good that people are doing for us or do we focus on their failures? The former brings gratitude to God and to the people concerned. The latter focus brings disillusionment and discontent.
Wonder why?
The Services Industrial Professional and Technical Union Cuba Solidarity Forum hosted Sheehan on International Working Women’s Day, March 8. On that day, she also finished the Ireland leg of her tour with a public meeting of students and activists organized by Amnesty International Society at Trinity College after meeting with Irish legislators earlier in the day.
He finally has his website up and running so I said I'd pass it on here to any of you avid readers who hadn't seen it
Tutu
Here are the trusses, gables and roof I-beams installed and ready for a roof. Have I mentioned how hot it's been cause it was a mite warmish. I figure I sweated approximately 5 Gatorades per hour. That's real construction speak right there.
it’s all ahead
i don't like to do things that aren't fun. so if Zumba is a party....
Even though it comes from a different starting point, it's interesting to think about how this is a similar question to Poll 87, which asked this question:
20. The Black Butterfly - All-Story Weekly 4 parts Sep 14, 21, 24, Oct 5
It was as the jalsa was about to begin, that Eishkom, in typical SA style plunged us into darkness. The wails, gasps of horror, collective moans, rippled through the hall. Our MC stood before us, alert, vibrant and began anyway (they were running way behind schedule), even as people scrabbled to set up lights and others reached for their cell phones to shed some light on the proceedings. I may be mistaken, but I had the distinct impression that our MC was blind. Which was why the women’s refusal to settle down annoyed me so completely. The words that sprang to mind were the opening verses of Surah Abasa,
Anyway, on to the earrings (before they disappear, too.)
He broke from Sundance’s embrace and sent her to bed. Leaving the door of his room open behind him, Ronan dropped onto his own bed. The new SoulDefender fell asleep without taking his shoes off.
As the movie opens, Max is hard at work deciphering suspicious international chatter from surveillance tapes and preparing voluminous reports for his CONTROL colleagues. He is such a valuable analyst that his boss, the Chief, is regrettably unable to offer him the one thing Max wants most in life and has been training for so diligently: to become a field agent.
Ughh and here I am committing ego-suicide by posting pictures of me in the dress after her...merely to show you how amazing this dress is! GET IT HERE!!
Chill for an hour.
I know that these boxes may not look as "fancy" as some of the other V-Day crafts you see on the web. However, in my humble opinion, I think they are the mot beautiful creations out there. Why? Because they were made with loving care and attention by my two special Valentines!
but has lifted up the humble.
to enhance their physical
Hello abode lovers! Are all of you surviving this stinkin' daylight savings crap? I'm not... as you can see, I'm still living one hour in the past. Hopefully by Friday I will be used to the time change! So, today I would like to share with all of you some of the fabulous products that one of my new sponsors, Quality Bath has to offer. Get ready for some serious eye candy abode lovers!
150 pages
“Father!” The princess’s head whipped around and a smile danced upon her lips, grew upon her face till it seemed the beam from her teeth rivaled the brightness of daylight.
What results are memory lapses, placing words in the wrong sequence, inability or no desire to read for very long, inability to focus; forgetting what you are just about to say; impatience with linear forms of communication (audio or written formats); a feeling of spaciness, being scattered; losing interestin research or complex information; feeling bombarded with words and talk and information; and a reluctance to write. Sometimes you feel dull and have no interest in analysis, lively intellectual discussion, or investigation.
Yep, it's getting late and I wanted to share this card I made this evening for my younger brother's birthday which was a few weeks ago. I haven't seen him and i'm not 100% sure if he'll be here on Easter or not so I thought i'd better get it made!
John A. Cooper, 40, Bayonne, N.J.
a girl to dance once with me,
The prophet Elisha often would travel through the town of Shunem, and in that town was a well-to-do couple who extended hospitality to him. At first, they simply offered Elisha a meal when he came through town. Then, seeing that Elisha needed a place to stay and study, they built a room for him above their house so that each time he came through town, he had a place to stay. He was so appreciative of their kindness that one day he asked the wife what he could do for her. His servant Gehazi later informed Elisha that the woman was barren and her husband was old. ” ‘About this time next year,’ Elisha said, ‘you will hold a son in your arms’ ” (2 Kings 4:16). A year later the son arrived.
And this is probably one of the things that I hate about myself. I’m just so much of coward to voice out my opinion. I’m afraid of how people would react: will they get angry? Consider me strange? Would I just waste their time?
And my random act of kindness was trying to help some people find their dog while I was on a walk with my dog.
super saturdays
Y’all know I have a soft spot for Arnot-Roberts. But can you blame me? Not only did Nate and Duncan give me the chance to work harvest with them this past year, but the wines are stunning. Here are some notes re the wines being poured on Thursday night.
because i want him to change things? even me and my heart? that's a right motive right?
Wednesday, April 15 -
Our wheat beer, König Ludwig Weißbier, is brewed using traditional methods and is bottle fermented (the “méthode champenoise”). This produces a lively, refreshing beer with a tight head and flavour notes of apple and bananas, which is highly accepted in many parts of the world. In its home market, König Ludwig Weißbier is among the top 6 wheat beer brands and is widely recognized as a Bavarian specialty.I'm pretty sure those folks know a little something about the Hefeweizen style as they've been doing it for, oh I don't know, centuries.
2. Later that night, the Cook nuclear power plant notified the state of Michigan that the Unit 2 main generator had leaked oil to the station’s absorption pond. An oil sheen covered approximately two acres of the pond. Cleanup efforts are now underway. The reactor is currently in cold shutdown.
So basically from just dealing with going full time at work and then passing these other bridges in the future I am dealing with work and job security, moving out, my wife dating someone else, money worries, formal split and more disruption for the kids
Yeah, whatever, you cold and soulless cock hoarder.
So, to the film. As per my recent review of ‘Chronicle’, if you’re not a fan of “handy-cam” films, then you’re cooking in the wrong kitchen. That said, the film does get around some of the ‘shaky-cam’ issue in satisfactory ways, making it easier on the eye. Before the film begins, there is a text sequence citing this as previously unseen video, hidden in Fort Knox or the Batcave or wherever, now being released after ‘x’ many years. It then starts off with stock footage: studio interviews with the astronauts, and standard NASA PR footage of the pre-launch build-up. This is interwoven with 8mm home movie filming of team / family BBQs, establishing the three astronauts as being human, having children etc, i.e. the whole empathy thing. Then we go back to more stock footage of the launch and journey to the moon (if you’re of a certain age, you probably remember this first time round i.e. Apollo 17!!)
The confused student asked, "Excuse me, but why are we doing this?"
I've been blog surfing this morning and enjoying many of your "fav" projects from 2010. So I thought I would post a list of my own favorites from 2010!!
ARC provided by publisher.
I enjoyed this novel so much more than I liked the first one in the series, The Goddess Test. I felt I got the know the characters and the motivations behind their actions a lot more in this one – maybe it’s because now we were in on the secret of just who each of the members of Henry’s family were.
- Check the automated account information phone line – 1-800-368-7550
Liberals fulminate against "racism" (by which they really mean "white people"). Racists, of whatever color, fulminate against other races. Conservatives pay lip-service to the quaint ideals of color-blind law and racial integration, but do nothing about them, and ignore the ever-increasing dangers of mass immigration. Chittum presents us with the prospect of race and racism as problems to be solved -- though he is pessimistic about our chances of solving them.
At one level they are constantly pushing for more political power and the local council is now nearly all Asian and changing our ways to their own. In the council chamber recently a memo was sent round exhorting non-Muslims to observe fasting practices during council meetings.
This week, on her show, Ellen showcased one of my all time favorite dancing celebrities, Stephen ‘tWitch’ Boss.
to stop the entrance of Chinese "coolies" while the federal government needed them to build railroads, that Congress declared immigration decisions exclusively under federal purview. And with states rights at their low ebb during Reconstruction, they found few if any jurists with the ideological predisposition to stand in their path.
So, you could imagine my surprise when Hailey tried to introduce a new trend...Halloween in January (and February, and now March). The girl is obsessed. She has not only chosen her Halloween costume three times now, she's also dismissed all of those ideas with complete disgust.
This morning on The Today Show they offered some money advice. This is always my favorite part of morning shows. They always have such great tips. Usually they are ones that I already know, but it is always great to be reminded.
3.Green Chilli : 1 slit longwise
The device is made up of a main body and a damper rod. The main body split into left and right sections bolted together. The left hand casing forms the cylinder, not only contains the fluid, but also channels machined in the outer casing form the fluid lines. Such that no external pipework is required. The right hand casing allows the damper rod to pass through and also houses bump stops to prevent the device bottoming at the end of its 16mm of bump travel or 23mm of droop travel. In total the device is just 220mm long (eye to eye).
the readiness of the
The MVI has also served as a leading indicator of Census multifamily statistics. The MVI began to improve strongly in the third quarter of 2009, one quarter before a similar trend emerged in the Census Bureau’s rental vacancy rate for buildings with at least five apartments. Although the Census series shows a slight surge in rental vacancy rates in the latest quarter, the MVI suggests that this will be a temporary setback.
Above any face artificial
Kate Bisson (Green) 304
I had never purchased from Iglot but had done some YouTube research before and they have similar items to Make Up For Ever's liquid blush for a fraction of the price, I decided to get one of these also to wear as an everyday blush and use the MUFE on on special occasions. I also purchased a bright pink blush which can be toned down with the right brush.
Thank you to everyone who prayed for me and
license and no law, either. And you know that that card will not get
At age 14 boys and girls are konfirmated and considered adults. We have a saying which goes something like this: Welcome to the adults table. When my parents were young it meant they could now drink and start dating. Today of cause it just means a big party much like a barmichva, and lots of cash and presents. It’s tradition to have a fancy car, horse and carriage or a motor bike pick you up straight from the church. Oliver had a friend of the family pick him up in a fancy Audi.
Q: Do you agree with the recently passed law in Arizona that empowers law enforcement officials to check whether a person being stopped or detained is a U.S. citizen?
That’s literally it! That’s all. I really suggest checking out the Lazy Rogue guide at the top, but keep these points in mind while levelling and you’ll at least end up slightly better than half the damage of that other rogue spamming /flirt at the healer.
812220 Cemeteries & crematories
Quantum Jumping, Samij Datta, 2012
It kind of grossed me out.
Italy’s story is a story in its own right. The pro multis question was voted on during the plenary assembly of the Episcopal Conference held in Assisi in November 2010. According to figures which also find their way onto the website edited by Vatican correspondent Sandro Magister, 171 out of 187 voters voted in favour of keeping for all. This reluctance to implement the requested change had also been expressed by regional Episcopal Conferences.
All physical diseases including cancer, heart disease but particularly skin complaints have been helped with Hypnotherapy and Psychotherapy. The power of suggestion and mental imagery is a tool all too often overlooked but which can be of immense help to vitiligo sufferers.
She always was a scrapper, never one to compromise. ”I am an ambitious writer – I don’t see the point of being anything; no, not anything at all, if you have no ambition for it.” The book evolves from memoir to manifesto, as impassioned on the subject of literature as her essay collection Art Objects (which, when I read it 16 years ago, left me cheering and wondering how I could join her society). T.S. Eliot, she says, kept her company when she felt alone at home; she found his books in the library where she collected murder mysteries for her mother. “I had no one to help me, but T.S. Eliot helped me.”
I have quite a few I like, but at the moment two pop to mind. One is from Nick Hewer, the really cool old guy on The Apprentice; ‘They took logic and tortured it until it screamed.’
Considering my previous design work I did in Adobe Photoshop and Dreamweaver I decided to continue working with these programs to make my website, having felt I had a good understanding to use them to my advantage. Although I developed since my previous designs by using a more modern theme with a clear white background but kept the line design in my overall website design, making it more organised and professional.
The toughest part of the read which Hamilton does well is with the torture. The kids are strong but now different. They are not the same children. You feel for them.
I truly believe that Amanda Burden’s hypersensitivity about superblocks and good public space design as exemplified by her Teardrop Park concerns and the rest of her Battery Park City experience is real. I think that in this respect she is true to her roots. I think that the passion that comes out in her rhetoric about the avoidance of superblocking at the World Trade Center site is honest and heartfelt. On the other hand her rhetoric defending density at Atlantic Yards because “it is a transit hub,” and “at the crossroads of two wide avenues in Brooklyn” that “can accommodate density, and density brings excitement, foot traffic, jobs” sounds perfunctory. I think she is toeing the line for her boss and she has dropped her concerns about superblocking and good public space design only because only with superblocking and the theft of streets from the public can the unprecedented density of Ratner’s no-bid megadevelopment be achieved.
“I know.”
Happy Birthday To Me! - my 20's are now a thing in my past - HELLLOOOOOO 30! ~ i was a bit scared thinking about this lil number coming up .. but not now .. i'm cool as a cucumber .. and i'm welcoming it with open arms and we're gonna steal the show my friends! -- Comon' 30, lets do this!
said and say he is the one that
A1 The Heavenly Music Corporation
We love Ruthie, and if it takes another year to bring her home (Please Lord, don't let it take another year! I really don't think it will. But what do I know?) we'll wait. Because she's worth every second of waiting. And no matter what, we'll never stop loving her and praying for her.
Release Date : 18 April 2003
In conclusion, we understand that It is only by Faith in His Word and the inspiration and leading of the Holy Spirit, then, that we are able to follow Jesus along the strait and difficult path whereby we transcend our worldly self-will and put on the New Man, a man centered and dedicated in the spirit to accomplishing God’s will here on this earth under the empowerment of the Holy Spirit.
Thanks again for everything Lindsey! I had a blast with you and will always remember that trip!
I’ve been meaning to address this for a couple of days. Ever since I first read the discussion on dynamiceclectic’s post “Necessity or Weakness”, regarding the desire to be in a relationship.
MAKE UP FOR EVER, the go-to brand for beauty professionals and makeup enthusiasts around the world, will be creating the looks for both QVC’s FNO and Mercedes-Benz Fashion Week broadcasts, and will offer a two-piece smoky metallic eye kit for viewers to purchase.
2 cups pumpkin or other winter squash, peeled, cut & steamed
I am totally convinced that the Propolis has been a good idea. Please do not misunderstand me – it cannot be a “cure” for an acute illness alone but it helps apparently in cases where the illness is persistent despite of academic medication:
First off, something good… The ‘Don’t Say Gay’ bill in my hometown state of Tennessee is essentially going nowhere. What’s more interesting to me more than anything else is that the politician who sponsored the bill is essentially dropping it like a hot potato. (Well, it did become a hot issue, for sure.) It kind of makes you wonder if all of these extreme bills that Republicans are proposing are nothing more than a “who’s got the biggest conservative penis” contest, right? Surely, no one can be that evil? Right?
SOS = Shoulder Outta Socket
Very quickly you will get very tired of this ritual of moving clutter back and forth, back and forth and you will confront your clutter and deal with it.
by B. Y. Williams
He’s back to being annoyingly angsty again. Whereas it was justified and well portrayed last episode, here… it’s business as usual. Yes I’m sure he was terrible affected by what he had to do, but here? It’s melodramatic and stupid. It does NOT feel like a natural progression from what he felt last episode. He fucking screams and runs away in the middle of the goddamn battle. But that was to be expected, really.
My stomach is torn up again, and yes, I have started the Prilosec again.
UPDATE (2): 13th October, 2011. The Irish Times reports that Paddy is considering suing NAMA in the Irish courts. “Mr McKillen is examining the possibility of taking an action against NAMA in the Irish courts as he believes the agency did not follow fair procedures selling the group’s debt to the two brothers.” There also seems to be a claim that Paddy was given just 57 minutes notice of the sale, though it is not at all clear if he was entitled to any notice whatsoever.
Anyway, our rule of thumb is to crate Sydney and Barley whenever we go somewhere for longer than 3 hours. And we have left them for as long as 8-9 hours, although only rarely.
Maybe resurrection will take the shape of forced laughter becoming free and genuine.
The move by Pakistan comes just five days after India test fired Agni-V to join the elite club of ICBM nations. AP
for many, forgiveness seems like an impossible task. the hurt is too deep. the behavior remains unchanged. the damage continues. the memories have permanent scars. the desire to forgive is present, but the will just won’t cooperate.
And he can’t even tell me the truth.
Here I am in a plane, skipping Tuesday. After dozing for more than eight hours, I tried to peek out the window. Outside it's midafternoon, and even at our starting-point it's not so very early in the morning. But the steward makes me shut the windowshade. All the way. Because the other passengers want to sleep.
Here is what the design team came up with.
R. Chetwynd Hayes – The Shadmock
consumed
For the first time in years I'm being the person I want to be.
Stay tuned for more news on the brewfront.
Don't know about you but I am REALLY behind on getting Christmas ON at the house...we lost our tree to yet another flood last winter...sigh. So I have to get a tree FAST!!! That also means no holiday decorations to be found...so unlike me :0( BUT I did manage to put together a MERRY MAILBOX Featuring Spellbinders™ Die Templates class for my LSS, Craft Fancy, in Arlington Hts. IL!!!
Attorney Christian: Like what Goo?
In the scene where he is dreaming, after pain and morphine have
Fun times in the halls of government.
Thank you to our wonderful J-BlackJack, Nao, for helping us decipher the Q&A that was too difficult to see in the scans by typing most of them out for us to translate! Couldn’t have done it without her!
"Before or after the Tryal, Preston sent me ten Guineas and at the Tryal of the Soldiers afterwards Eight Guineas more, which were. . .all the pecuniary Reward I ever had for fourteen or fifteen days labour, in the most exhausting and fatiguing Causes I ever tried: for hazarding a Popularity very general and very hardly earned: and for incurring a Clamour and popular Suspicions and prejudices, which are not yet worn out and never will be forgotten as long as History of this Period is read...It was immediately bruited abroad that I had engaged for Preston and the Soldiers, and occasioned a great clamour....
Trying to manually line up a target is downright maddening. You’re a sitting duck who can’t move when looking down your gun’s sights, and the aiming reticle is inexplicably tied to the left thumbstick, opposite the camera controls. After spending 99 percent of the game using the right stick to command point of view and the left stick for movement, it’s ludicrous to suddenly switch during an attack when quick reflexes are a matter of life and death.
The action seems to have intensified a wee bit and I fear a game may break out at any time now.
--Keith Waterhouse discusses Torn Curtain, for which he did some uncredited rewrites with Willis Hall; in Streets Ahead: Life After City Lights.
As much fun as not having to go to work is, it's a relief to not be frantically searching for a job anymore. Working part-time is pretty much the best of both worlds (with exception of the smaller paycheck).
She never knew that her liver had been ripped in half and blood was rushing into her peritoneum.
opposition Democratic Alliance
A third particularity of the Olympia gig is due to a big larsen problem during "Shine On You Crazy Diamond", at the beginning of the first verse. David stopped, and after the problem was identified (refer to the title of the RoIO ;-)), David restarted the song from the beginning! Furthermore - probably to avoid to play twice the same solos during the same concert - he did totally improvised lines during the intro, and also during the first electric solo just after Syd's Theme! This performance of "Shine On You Crazy Diamond" at the
Overall, I couldn’t get enough of this book. Imagery, plot, characters everything was easy to fall into step with. The only thing I hope for is a glossary at some point so I can make sure I’m pronouncing character names correctly, but other than that personal preference I can’t wait to see what Thoma has in store for Elei in the future. Oops… yes, the story doesn’t end with this one.
Jonah also heard the voice of God in 1:1-3. He knew the One speaking but still rebelled against the command and disobeyed. You would think that if one knew the sovereignty of God it would change his life. Well, it didn’t. How often has it been said, “If only Jesus would show Himself, I would become a Christian?” How often in Biblical history this very thing was done and yet those concerned did not believe.
3 tsp Holiday Excitement
People get on.
A really fabulous layout Gayle - well done
Three years ago, beginning on September 3, 2008, Ben and Barb Stillwagon started visiting some of the places that Guy Fieri had featured on his show Diners, Drive-Ins and Dives. They had tallied visits to 249 of the over 450 restaurants from the show, and on Wednesday, September 14, 2011, the Stillwagon's chose Guy Fieri's restaurant, Johnny Garlic's in Santa Rosa, CA as their 250th. Guy Fieri was there, and he and the Stillwagon's finally had a sit-down lunch to pour over their travel stories.
Stir and finish browning meat mixture
Some people can lose weight on fad diets and keep it off, but very often it’s due more to the alterations they make to their lifestyle while on the fad diet,
the sun is mine, the grave.
The goal of this blog from the start was to put the focus on coaches and their stories. I hope I have done a good job at impartially writing about their lives, but if you feel I have not, do not hesitate to leave feedback.
* Words of wisdom and advice to any aspiring writer?
The Boss spoke to me on the Monday and accused me of being asleep while 'your customers were calling you.' He trusted these fools more than me.
we are currently motoring across Kansas, what a very flat and windy place! Yesterday we drove for twelve hour with eight children, four dogs, two cats, two roosters two grown ups, one motor home and one van. Last night we had the privilege of staying with Dane's Aunt Jeannie and Uncle Kent, in Alexander, Kansas. What A warm welcome we received they have a beautiful old farmhouse, the dogs and children were able to run in there spacious yard! We were treted to a home cooked hot meal and ice cream and cake for dessert. Everyone was very happy!
I think the real issue is that we try to fit all families, all kids and all parents into one generic mold. You know what your kid can handle. You know what you want to explain. You know the maturity level of your child and his ability to tell reality from make-believe. You know your situation in life and how the cartoons would affect your particular children. So, go for it. Or don’t.
He smiled and leaned over to kiss her forehead.
Post-cake, I’m becoming rather bored about this meal. Which, looking back on it, is how I felt about the royal wedding as well. Yeah, it went off without a hitch. No one stepped on Kate’s dress (which was to die for. I will wear one quite similar in my imaginary wedding). Neither Kate or Will botched the other’s name during the ceremony. Damn, there wasn’t any civil disobedience or streakers. It was rather dull, no?
“And Everyday I walk Beside Him… Never catching his eyes… No… He would not allow… I merely watch his Foot Slide, and his Cane Tap… “Tap…” “Tap…” “Tap…”
Migrating into dense dimensionless temporal atemporal planes
Level 3: STR: +9, Increases your attack speed.
Weber points us toward Nietzsche as the common source for serious thinkers of the twentieth century. He also tells us what the single fundamental issue is: the relation between reason, or science, and the human good. When he speaks of happiness and the last man, he does not mean that the last man is unhappy, but that his happiness is nauseating. An experience of profound contempt is necessary in order to grasp our situation, and our capacity for contempt is vanishing.
Too CUTE!!
Hat are black
The first issue is what kind of demand is there for Earthbound and Mother in North America. Well first lets use official numbers from Nintendo Power back in 2008. Every month Nintendo Power polled its loyal Nintendo readers as to what was the most wanted Virtual Console game, from June 2008-October 2008 Earthbound won consistently taking the number one spot. During the holiday wrap up Nintendo Power announced Earthbound was the number one most wanted Virtual Console game in North America. The NP staff however tried down playing its demand by making it the fourth most wanted staff pick. In June 2008 Mother made the top five most wanted VC games list coming in at number 4. But from July-October Mother consistently held the second spot on the list making it the second most wanted Virtual Console game. In February’s 2009 issue the list of most wanted NES game of all time was topped by none other then Mother. The readers had spoken. But mysteriously the Nintendo Power staff didn’t even put Mother on their list of top 5.
They found the sanctuary desolate, the altar desecrated, the gates burnt, weeds growing in the courts as in a thicket or on some mountain, and the priests’ chambers demolished.
But beyond that stabbing feeling of loss, which could just be age, there is also a hard-nosed anger at all the fear that is being dumped on us. Some of the dumpers are well-meaning, but some are sneering blamers who refuse to accept the fact that children are not more threatened today. The crime rate is back to what it was around 1970. After that it climbed till 1993 and has been declining ever since, according to hardnosed numbers from the Department of Justice. So if you were a child anytime after Nixon resigned, the crime rate is actually lower now than when you were a kid. (So, for that matter, is infant mortality – four times lower than when I was born.)
Maybe start over, write something pretty
Nama Shoyu – Typically called for and used in raw food recipes, nama shoyu is unpasteurized soy sauce. However, because the vast majority of soy sauces are heated about 118°F / 47°C during pasteurization, you must read the label to confirm that the sauce is truly “raw”. Many brands label themselves nama shoyu even though they have been pasteurized.
Sessions was always a treat to watch in Cleveland too. Rain a ton on your team and just make it look easy, play some hard dee and be an energy “who the hell is that?” guy, but always a touch left of vision. In hell-a, that’s a better angle, might as well let the cameras eat up Kobe and Brown and the Odom hangover. Just nestle right in, there’s your locker, here’s the keys, now do what you do my man.
closing in,
So while I’m getting out he says in an oh-by-the-way voice “Mom, I need you to wipe my butt.” I’m like “What?? Why do I need to wipe your butt?” (Since I know he didn’t use the potty while I was in the bathroom!) He then says that it’s because he went poop. When I asked him where he said “Outside.” Yes, outside. When I asked where outside he confessed that he went on my front steps. MY FRONT STEPS!!! Where approximately 37 neighbor houses can see! Never mind that he pooped on the brand new door mat I picked up last night.
At the beginning of the New Testament, Mary is described as treasuring and pondering events in her heart. Then, there is that intense preacher in the desert, St. John the Baptist, who had people travel from all over the country into the desert to experience his ministry. What did his speech have that converted such difficult categories of people, like the greedy tax collectors, the tough military, and the professional prostitutes? Even the haughty King Herod listened to his prisoner’s words.
Fresh *frozen* figs, halved, thawed (from Lyon Farms)
The album’s ECM-ish title is Albanian for ‘path,’ ‘road’ or ‘journey,’ an absolutely apt description of the trek this trio takes, despite however many other ECM titles have used or deserved this particular appellation in English or other languages. The trio, comprised of the pianist, bassist Patrice Moret and drummer Samuel Rohrer, certainly embarks upon some sort of a journey here. But it’s hard to say whether the program or the trio goes anywhere.
Men can get dressed in less than a minute - until they get married, I had two colours of socks: black and white.
I felt: Invincible because I ran the whole way!
Size : One size, Fits UK 4
Host: Savannah Guthrie and Joe Scarborough
So anyway you can get these kits from Make and Mingle or from the love kit sew website.
Roger Daltrey Without your love UK
Although, it seems that half the village she has lived in for the last 50 odd years has come to visit her...and when my brother or I can't take my Dad to the hospital, someone is always there to help.
Glancing at the television set once more, I saw footage of a plane plummeting toward the ground at uncontrollable speed. As it descended, smoke began to rise from the engines and by the time it crashed onto the tarmac, fire was blazing and the plane had tumbled onto it's side. As I watched it, as if in slow motion, words began to slide across the bottom of the screen.
I've been super busy adding fun items to the shop. As a teenager I spent my Summers volunteering at the local library on my military base. One summer I transferred over 1000 books from the old card catalog system to the new bar code scanners we all take for granted these days. You might think, I'd never want to see a library card or stamp again, but just the opposite is the case. I love use library cards for gift wrap, journaling in my scrapbook and Project Life projects and making tags.
My movements.
Jersey dress - Basque by Myer
*C/stock - Stampin' Up! Choc chip
Only part of this can be explained by the growth in college attendance. While a greater share of 18- to 24-year-olds are in school than ever before, the employment rate has fallen regardless of enrollment.
Guards and servants fanned out. Glass shoe in hand, the prince couldn’t think how he could possibly have lost her. The orange coach had been there, within easy reach, when they’d inexplicably disappeared, in front of his eyes and his entourage. The road stayed empty and a search found nothing on the wayside. Clutching her slipper, the prince bemoaned his defeat as they returned home.
which was great because it was easy to get through for the little ones
Remember when I was talking about all that fabric I had when I was making napkins...I made like 30 napkins and didn't even make a dent in my fabric! Well, I thought I'd make my own chair socks...the chair sock idea was looking perfect again!
Do they have any nick names? Not really... Although I do call him Squishy quite a lot of the time.
5. Mama Be Good—the last of my autism mama blog nominations (and the last of my VBA nominations, for now). Brenda unschools her autistic son—a rare choice for children on the spectrum—and practices attachment parenting (a parenting approach we fell into with Jonah, because it Worked). Like Jess at A Diary of a Mom, Brenda learns as much from her son as she teaches. She allows her son to lead, and in doing so, respects who he is and what he needs.
At the moment am mentally unbalance as I have limited time..I will brief in full as soon as I get home,once you have the money wired kindly get back with me the confirmation control number and the full details cos that's is what I will be needing in picking up the money with my passport...
Based on Mormon, Stephenie Meyer’s 4-book “vampire romance” series, the Twilight movie was released last week (Nov 21, 2008) in 3419 cinema theaters across the nation and grossed over $70 million its first weekend. It’s the hottest pop culture phenomenon since Harry Potter mania.
Good riddance.
(Reuters) — Controversial Maricopa County, Arizona, Sheriff Joe Arpaio went missing on Monday night, March 26, and did not return until 48 hours later. Family and co-workers noticed a difference in his demeanor and attitude.
The post labels. There were SO many. And as new labels were added, I never went back to update old posts. It was a giant ball of mess. This weekend I deleted all of the labels from 505 posts and went back through each and every one with a smaller list of category options. Ahhh, MUCH better!
Jeera crushed - 1 tsp
The Maya named this plant after the Goddess of the Forest and Healing, Ix-canan, likely due to the abundant anti-bacterial and anti-fungal properties used in treating a large variety of skin ailments. Everything from sores, ulcers, fungus, rashes, burns, insect bites, burns, and bee stings can be treated effectively with this natural plant remedy.
I think everyone needs heroes, even if they’re adults. In my head, the heroes are all grown up now, and people who take on evil politicians and giant corporate entities. I wish there were more I could think of. They also tend to be highly intelligent. Stephen Hawking style. I’d like Stephen Hawking to be able to transfer his intellect and intelligence into the realm of politics somehow. That would be my modern day hero, and he could fly too.
Director Steven Spielberg has a cameo as the Clerk at the Cook County Assessor’s office near the end of the film.
There are eight books shortlisted from nominations by public libraries in Ireland, Austria, Estonia, France, Germany, Greece, Hungary, Poland, Russia, The Netherlands, South Africa, Brazil, the USA and Canada.
She shed tears of joy because hacienda workers, who had been caught in the vortex of a decades-long period of peasant unrest over a feudal land ownership system, would finally get a piece of the vast estate straddling Tárlac City and the towns of Concepción and La Paz.
This time last year I was firmly in the anti-Kindle camp and wrote several posts extolling the virtues of the printed page over the soulless, grey world of ebooks. But I protested too much and one blogger very astutely commented that I was actually "on the verge of Kindledom".
THE PRECESSION OF THE EQUINOXES
I am alarmed and concerned to learn about the dwindling number of staff expected to produce the quality newspapers we expect in Enfield and have no doubt that the non replacement of staff who leave and the threat of further redundancies will lead to an erosion in the quality of the newspapers produced and will lead to the demise of a very important service for the people of Enfield and beyond. I have been a councillor for 17 years and have had the pleasure to deal with and get to know many journalists who have worked on the Enfield Gazette and Advertiser. I have always found the staff to be hard working, talented and dedicated to their job; Enfield as a borough has been the better for it as a result because they do their job properly, as it is meant to be done and the people of Enfield will be the poorer for any decline in standards.
Today I made a three layer torte for my Doc, for Thanksgiving, because if there is anyone I am thankful for it is her. She takes care of our whole family and the awesome thing is she cares!
we spent our saturday at the yaveh shamma orphanage, run by pastor gaetan (who has been dubbed 'best smile in haiti' and he deserves it!). we pulled up in our van outside the gated walls and my heart was in my throat. we have been sponsoring one of the children at the orphanage and the thought of meeting her and her friends had already brought me to tears several times before even leaving on our trip.
The American Eagle fragrance Seventy Seven contained 24 chemicals unlisted on the label, the highest number of any of the fragrances tested. Chanel’s Coco had 17 and Abercrombie & Fitch’s Fierce for men had 11.
9:45am (Cayman doesn't observe daylight savings). Just typed in final edits for first half (parts one and two); it will only now need printing out and a final proof against the marked-up edit where new typing may have introduced new errors.
Dawn is one of those amazing, perky people who finds hope and humor in everything. She is the bright red balloon that keeps on sailing no matter how rough the winds, and she does it with such sparkle and grace that she keeps us laughing in the midst of our own challenges.
Author: Nakano Junko
Oh. I'll tell you!
You could be good at this my master said
My own former profession of advertising – an integral part of what the media presents to the public – is massively regulated. The Advertising Standards Authority (ASA) and other bodies pre-approving scripts for television commercials demand (and get) full evidential back-up for any claim made in a UK advertisement. In addition, regulatory bodies can order a campaign to be taken off air, out of newspapers, or down from posters if enough consumers complain variously about misleading claims or offensive content. None of this, of course, stops sniffy hacks referring to us as ‘the hidden persuaders’, constantly ‘selling people things they don’t need’. God help us all from people who want to tell us what we need: and God save us from hypocrites who live off advertising income, while reserving the right to be condescending and accusatory about those crafting the ads.
sea salt and cracked black pepper (plenty of pepper)
I was thinking about how many reality TV shows are on these days and have come to the conclusion there are more reality shows than regular shows. I was wondering what shows would appeal to the young adult audience. We have so many to choose from, Jersey Shore, American Idol, Punk’d, Khloe & Lamar, The Voice, only to mention a few reality shows; then we have regular television programs such as Glee, Smash, The Secret Circle, The Vampire Diaries, Gilmore Girls; and as always the usual “family” type shows such as Bones, House, NCIS, NCIS-LA, The Middle, Suburgatory, and Modern Family.
Never fear. Just color the image and ignore the snow for now. It would be way too hard to try and get a smooth blend from light to dark while avoiding snowflakes in this picture. Same with the glints of light on the berries, and the light in this little chickadee's eyes. I just won't worry about it.
Thank you all so much for your support and love of Wryn and the other images....I am humbled and so pleased that you all are having so much fun with her...that makes me want to draw more---and that is the best feeling of all. :) So thanks for making my day in so many ways---I hope you had a good day too. :)
So yes, most reunions there are about 80% of the above list all gallivanting around the local Dairy Queen and Target together. My cousin in law jokes that we’re like locusts. We’ve named ourselves a LUnami… given that the name we all share is Lu. And we’re like a tsunami. I don’t think this really needed much explanation, but I felt like I had to give it anyway, just in case. Sorry for undermining your intelligence. We just get a lot of weird looks when we say it in public.
Bollywood hottie Priyanka Chopra reportedly got paid a whopping amount of 9 crore for Zanjeer. While this sum makes her the highest earning actor in Indian cinema today, her pay cheque is a distant dream for her counterparts down south.
The Lord spoke to my spirit and said "why are you window shopping for the things I will freely give you? Go into the store, you can have them." I knew that He was telling me not to fear shopping in His "Heavenly storehouse" because the price had already been paid.
Start over. Write simple declarative sentences, then add the pretty.
When I first found Madecasse online I was just in awe of their fair trade practices and going beyond what they could to ensure building up the Cocoa industry in Madagascar. Experiencing Madagascar first hand int he Peace Corp they learned to live and be friends among the people there. Wanting to go above and beyond most companies they integrated the community into much more than just growing the beans as the illustration below shows.
Events: Semi-Annual Beer Brunch with Hoosier Beer Geek
He sweeps away them by his hands,
Irgens LM, Baste V, Wilk P, et al. Clubfoot in offspring of servicemen in the Royal Norwegian Navy. Teratol Int J Abnorm Dev 1998; 57: 34.
First, it stated that the very fact that MySpace had developed and installed remedial tools to deal with infringement showed that they at least had an apprehension of infringement. It also dismissed the claim that this was done, keeping in mind the requirements under the DMCA, by observing that the post-infringement curative measures provided for under the DMCA are sufficient in the American context, but not in the Indian legal sense. Now, I find this to be an incorrect reading of the Indian law since
Definietly J.K. Rowling, I would want to a feast at Hogwarts.
“We really need to get going if we don’t want to be late. Please put your oxygen on Mom. The doctor is going to be upset with you if you don’t have it on.” Grace humbly requested as she chose a different blouse for her mother to wear. There was no hurry but Grace knew how slow Doris moved. “I ain’t letting nobody see me with that thing stuck up my nose!” Doris demanded as Grace attempted to help Doris get dressed for yet another doctor’s visit. Grace was at a loss about what to do with Doris. She knew her mother extremely well and came to the conclusion that the short trip would inevitably feel like a very long one. “Did you check the mail, Grace?” Doris asked again. “Yeah Mom, you didn’t get anything.” Grace insisted. The thought of becoming like her ill mother terrified Grace. However, she didn’t believe she would ever allow her pride to stop her from wearing a oxygen mask, if she ever needed it.
The Bacterial Flagellum
I went for a bra-fitting today (hallelujah!), and the girl doing the fitting asked me where I got my cute watch. I guess it does give the impression it's one of these:
So often I push it aside...I feel the floodgates begin to open and quickly slam them shut pretending they aren't bulging and ready to burst...I know February is a bittersweet month for me...it brings the only memories of my sweet fourth born that I have, it also brings the memories of the most tangible love I've known through His hands and feet in others. It also brings an aching to hold my sweet four year old boy and kiss him and know him.
my face
On the back of your postcard, make it look like a real postcard. A space for a stamp, some lines for an address..
6/18 Omaha, NE - Waiting Room
While in a grocery store this morning, I had a brief chat with a woman who was admiring the hyacinths. She picked up a pot for me to sniff and told me about the big purple blooms in her own garden.
Of course I can always distract him by yelling: "Hey look! It's George Zimmerman!"
So let’s look at the Seldon case from the point of view of someone with no particular interest in the subject. What would the headlines tell them?
Brighten someone's day with this altered Mason Jar by putting cute stuff inside and decorating the jar. I used the stripe ribbon and tied a bow and added a cute tag that matches my top design. I used
That’s something I will strive for. But today, I feel stumped. Do I tell you about my writing board? Or maybe about the book that started all this? Probably next time. Right now, I feel like sharing what starting this blog is already doing to me.
Chopsticks at Dawn
None of this is to suggest that the fault for this entire movie lays at Smith’s feet. As I mentioned earlier, there’s no chemistry at all between Smith and Kline, and the awful script couldn’t have inspired them to give much of a crap beyond their professionalism. There’s a lot of infantile boob jokes (including the title of this review, which is one of the funnier lines in the film), including a numbing scene where they play a game of “touch my breast” with the fake boobs Gordon has made for his women’s costume.
From your face
With their comeback nearing on the 29th, Big Bang TOP’s teaser photo was released. It revealed the shocking new transformation and concept, leaving it up to netizens to foreshadow that the rest of the members’ hairstyles will be just as big of a transformation.
Is there something special about someone that you will someday miss?
Also included is a trailer.
I hiked to the top a couple of days ago and thought I’d share some pictures from that hike.
other information, that Mitt Romney would win in a landslide if the election were held today:
We all know there are several tiers of “justice” — such inequalities persist in every society that has ever existed. In fact, I’ve often suspected that Justice wears a blindfold so she won’t have to see the miscarriages issued in her name.
For a long time I've wondered how those few diners on the Upper East Side—Gardenia, Three Guys, Viand, Soup Burg—survive in such a pricey neighborhood. The New York Observer answered my question today: They don't!
Let’s make two assumptions: the US government has recently been approached by Wang Lijun, vice mayor and head of the public security bureau in Chongqing and by Cheng Guangcheng, who is a blind civil rights advocate under house arrest in Shandong for political asylum. The second assumption is that Wang Lijun was denied political asylum and Cheng was granted asylum.
This slightly melancholic but profoundly beautiful sampler unites dramatic songs by Nurlaila Karim and Maggie McNeal, and ironical ones by the Belgians Flip Kowlier and De Kreuners. There's romance by Ann Christy and Blof, and positivism by Ramses Shaffy and Daniel Lohues...
And if your the praying type I do have a specific prayer request for sleep while staying here in the hospital for what could be weeks - you would think it would be so easy to finally get to take a long nap after five years of being a tired Mom to so many kids but it is proving a bit harder than I thought.
Elizabeth’s Granny’s Westside looked the part of an old school cocktail in its small juice glass with egg white foam on top. Other ingredients in the lip-smacking libation were a homemade baked apple infused vodka, lemon, lime, simple syrup and soda. She didn’t want to share hers and I was confident I was winning out by not having to share mine.
from Seven Prayers That Can Change Your Life
I’d live with scarlet Majors at the Base,
But, you know what? They really aren't. The world is in constant motion. And time does change our perceptions of players. We should embrace that -- time is often our best friend. It took the voters 11 years to put away whatever emotional or immediate feelings they had about Duke Snider and vote him into the Hall of Fame. It took them 13 to determine Bruce Sutter's role in baseball history. Lou Boudreau made it on his 10th ballot, Bob Lemon his 12th, Jim Rice his 14th, and while all that seems ridiculous -- while it might even BE ridiculous -- I think it's part of the way our mind works. Over time, small slights are forgotten, new viewpoints emerge, new discussions shed light.
Well this band must have been playing at a rain dance because it really is hosing it down out there.
I simply melted the butter, chocolate and syrup in a Pirex bowl over a pan of boiling water. Off the heat, I stirred in the cornflakes and arranged in cupcases, making a nest shape using the back of a teaspoon.
I have used it as a replacement for flours in most of my recipes (1 for 1).
Holden and Miller must thread the needle between the Earth government, the Outer Planet revolutionaries, and secretive corporations - and the odds are against them. But out in the Belt, the rules are different, and one small ship can change the fate of the universe.
And later in the novel, although much earlier in Anna's life, veteran photographer Theo - who I modelled on Robert Capa - says this:
Look into your fridge and cupboards and see what’s really healthy. Every single food, except fresh meat and produce, is likely to be drenched in some sort of fat, salt or sugar — the worst hidden culprit, high fructose corn syrup. From Wikipedia:
Elang: We have been doing very well. Before the release of the EP, Take the Air, and the album, Nine, Junga and I travelled together and Yongrin participated in producing Park Jiyoon's 7th album.
In the same area recently I watched a wren systematically picking off insects from the two climbing roses I have, fascinating to watch as it went up and down every branch. And this is what is fascinating about watching wildlife at home in the garden. We all think, oh yes there's a lot of birds in the garden, but how many of us actually watch what they're doing, how often, why and when? I know you bloggers will, but the general public probably miss a lot of free entertainment by not taking time to observe for prolonged periods.
— Be judicious about naming criminal suspects before the formal filing of charges.
Do you want to watch this with your significant other?
Easter 2, therefore, is the continuation of our new life gloriously begun Easter Sunday. After the jaw-dropping, world-altering news of Easter, Easter 2 is a coming into our inheritance (though we don’t receive all of it at once). Every Sunday then is a celebration, a wild party (no matter what worship style your church or denomination uses) that just can’t stop rejoicing over the hysterically wonderful, outlandish fact that we have been granted brand new lives.
others savor
Please don’t tell me to sew: I used to sew over 80% of my wardrobe for over a decade. It does require several hours per month. That creative fun time is now replaced by cycling time, blogging and when I get around to it, art work.
"In that case the Four Knot should be here," Rel snapped. "You can't arrest me without him in the First Realm."
Why I like so much about them even though I don't care for these thing 1 and thing 2?
Mr Green is scheduled to join officials from British Airways, Virgin Atlantic and the British Airports Authority at a committee hearing in mid-May, where he will be quizzed on what measures are in place to cut the……
Elga - 'Elga's Miniatures'
2. Cover a piece of card slightly larger than the frame size with extra wide double sided tape. Leave the backing on. Place the 2 dies cutting edge down onto the double sided tape and secure with a couple more small pieces of tape. Die cut the frame.
She cannot ask her parents as she has been told they are part of the entire Christmas conspiracy. So, like any child, she decides to wait up for Santa to make his appearance in the one room closest to the roof where he lands his sleigh – the attic.
Josiah turned one March 5. He is a big boy now, too! He began walking the week he turned one, so he is busy as he tries to keep up with his sisters. We have enjoyed having him around. Boys are sure different from girls! Early on he took up interest in playing with balls and cars and especially enjoys being outside. One thing I was always told before he came into the world was that, 'boys are so sweet and love their mommas!'. There is so much truth in that. Josiah is very close to his daddy- they are pretty big buddies, but he sure loves his momma. Every morning I really look forward to going in to his room and seeing his joyful smile and his readiness to see me. I just love his happy-go-lucky personality. I remember praying daily for him while he was in the womb that he would be a good, happy baby. ;)
This kicked start my food adventure to the remaining days I was in San Francisco. Having done all my research on places to try out, I forgotten to search by from and to and roughly how far across town did I have to travel to Phat Philly. Elisabeth and I just hopped on to a taxi in search of this place where I wanted to try out. That's when Elisabeth highlighted to me that next time I need to search from our hotel for the nearest place to dine.. LOL.
Also it's no longer a shocking news I believe. On Wednesday, the computing world has lost a great inventor and entrepreneur. Someone who really thinks outside the box and gave us lots of vision through his inventions and visions. The person I'm referring to is Apple's Co-Founder, Steve Jobs who has lost his battle to pancreatic cancer. Being in the computing industry and though I do not work for Apple; we do feel a sense of loss. Lets just say being an IT student, we have looked up to people like them as inspiration and perhaps hope to be a little like them one day. I do not have the perfect words other than a heart felt condolence to his family.
In The Hunger Games selected teenagers (known as tributes) have to compete to the death in an arena. During the two week period between selection and the commencement of the games they are trained, but also taught to try to sell themselves to the sponsors who can parachute in supplies for them during the games. Watching the movie, I couldn't help thinking about the book Poor Bashing, by Jean Swanson. She quotes an advocate for the poor who says
I’ve read that potted plants should almost be watered daily!
Anyway, for those of you who have not read this blog since the beginning, I will briefly recap. (Those of you non-lazy people who know the history can go get a snack and come back later. ) Okay, so prior to our departure for Khartoum I found out that we couldn't take the dogs on the plane -- Kernel was too big for accompanying baggage and cargo into Sudan is not an option if you want your pet to actually live through the trip....and we found out not long after, that Sudan associated swine-flu with domestic dogs, so Jack couldn't make it either. Long story short, I found them both a home with a retired fireman who lives on 10 acres. My city-raised boys didn't know what hit them! Fast forward to our return - and I go out to visit the boys....they're all very happy. The guy who adopted them is all alone and obviously loves them (well, who wouldn't?! My babies rock!) and we didn't want to take them away from him. (Plus, the condo only allows you to have one baby - so it would be like Sophie's Choice....) SOOOO, we were going to be dogless.
This was my starting point; in 1996 I came up with a second theme; gold angels. I bought gold plastic angels after Xmas, and painted their faces to suit my decor. Know it takes me approximately 2-3-years to develop a theme; from the ornaments on the tree to decorating the mantle over the fireplace etc.
The EDL's leaders say the movement isn't racist - but many of the placards were pretty offensive to the few ordinary Muslims who saw them. And with the British National Party suffering internal battles, the organisation is now attracting the attention of a wide spread of international far right anti-Islamic activists.
So without further ado here are our choices for this week!
Germaine Cheng, Elizabeth McLean
Get ready for the big time
4. Any recent music/books/films you would recommend?
I-i-i-ff you sail --
For the last several years we have tried a variety of activities for Mother's Day and the following activity is probably the easiest in some regards. It did take us a long time to finish and one of us had to be back at the tables the entire time but we also did this with 35 1st graders.
Gladys is a modest woman in the best sense of that word, but "modest" should never be confused with "insignificant". People like my friend form the very spine of society. They are the ones that work, look after aged relatives, support friends and continue to foster a sense of community in a society that seems hell bent on tearing that very thing apart.
Readers hoping Osman will deliver a verdict on gentrification will be disappointed. He is a self-declared “fence-sitter,” focused more on putting the complex phenomenon in a broader historical context, and defining the brownstoner movement within the “polycultural, polycentric and polyhistorical” world that is Brooklyn.
- In Lebanon any man may legally have sex with any animal just as long as it is a female.
Matt got a little bit of the cocoon making process on video, which I'll post later.
ORIGINAL SONG
Wimbledon College is also participating in CAFOD’s Thirst for change campaign. Recognising the strong track record the UK has in supporting international development, we are now asking David Cameron to call on world leaders at the G8 summit in May to turn the tide on water poverty.
Well, to add to this fun, this was the Tuesday before my half marathon. I was so convinced this was just tendon issues and I was just checking the boxes to get my referral. The possibility of not running never crossed my mind. I had done a 4 mile run on Monday night! Please note, this wasn’t severe pain this time around, I just was becoming aware of the areas again and they were painful if I did a trigger point on them. There were a lot of plans to change if I didn’t run as this was in Atlanta and I live in Wichita…travel was involved. I was due to leave Wichita on Saturday and run on Sunday. So, for three days I made contingency plans for not running the half.
I'd like to thank my partner Kim for the great stash, I loved working w/ these buttons. Another big thanks to Cindy for putting this swap together! Here's the list , enjoy!
Publisher: Blackstone Audio, Inc.
Total Happiness.
It is better than most
Though we can never be sure
* Total your points in the comments field of this blog and tell me how you earned your points.
Although this book is ripe with rich photos of the beautiful costumes and characters, what I valued most about it was reading the history behind the series. In particular, my favorite part was reading about American heiresses like Cora, or "Buccaneers," who saved many of the British aristocrats with their fortunes...while having to adjust to the uptight society and cultural mores of their new home. I'm always interested in the British-American matches, for obvious personal reasons!
Grab your badge to display on your blog for being featured in today's My Crafty Picks!!
Today I am going to enjoy my day off and take my boys, niece and nephew swimming. My sister is a full time student and she has a huge test on Friday that she is studying for so I am going to spend a lot of time with her little munchkins this week. They are so excited about swimming today, they told me yesterday that they were going to go to sleep early and be extra good so they could go :)
Peanut butter cookies are a simple pleasure. The flavor is hardly complex and is a comforting one for most of us. Some will laugh and some will merely nod in understanding when I confess that a jar of peanut butter and a spoon was a frequent treat in my childhood.
Also, it’s worth noting that Dwight Neuenschwander won the David Halliday and Robert Resnick Award for Excellence in Undergraduate Physics Teaching in 2000. He also wrote the well reviewed book entitled “Emmy Noether’s Wonderful Theorem”.
“You know Brad Pitt! He was in Happy Together”. Internally I’m thinking, “Nah, I don’t”, but out loud I say, “…his name is familiar…”. Perhaps a poor choice because now it continues. “He was in The Favour too, did you see that?”
Friends would say those are pretty accurate words describing who I am. Life works when I honour my values. I am 100% sure of that.
and that is me for tonight.
You need to drop your body fat percentage to a point where the musculature is visible.
The Republican plan would raise the debt limit in two tranches, requiring a second vote early next year after a deficit reduction commission exacts steep spending cuts…. – Business Insider, 7-25-11
Makes 24 Sliders.
On my turn I simply moved the Destroyer out of the way and took a swing at her which amazingly hit and got half her health. Then Torch charged in, I made sure the first boosted hit was with his sustained attack rip saw, but she was dead after the charge attack.
These are just a few highlights from the conference, where it became clear to me how closely showcased examples of emerging best practise around the globe align with the work we are already doing at CMDHB. It goes without saying that this made me immensely proud. By global comparison, CMDHB is a truly progressive organisation that is not just tackling the challenges facing healthcare around the world but which is also in the vanguard of making change happen.
Why? I thought you said to learn all the skills? Yes, but here is the issue for me. As a busy father who works full-time, I don’t always know when I will be available to learn. I find opportunities in the few mins in between things. By dividing it this way I don’t waste time an energy trying to decided what I should do. I can also make those small moments in time build upon each other so I can get exponential growth in that skill. Then by switching the next week I make sure I don’t over emphasis just one skill.
Community and Parks and Rec
How did you get the word out among your existing contacts? Plenty of people know I write, but I'm not sure they got the memo that I'm part of a real business venture now.
Really good news: your own state parks, whether in Florida or elsewhere, are probably just a few miles from you. And whether or not it seems likely to those of you in the northeast, spring is within scenting distance. A few more weeks, everybody. In Florida and Arizona we can already hear the herald of spring in the eagerly-awaited clarion call with which baseball fans put winter to rest: "Pitchers and catchers report". Spring is coming. Spring training is coming. Birds and flowers are coming. In a few weeks we'll all be able to step outside and bask in it.
Time to answer the call even if I dropped the ball. I feel a little rusty after a nice family brake. The holidays were full and fun...oh and the stomach flu came visiting. Noise filled our house for a few weeks and I welcomed the familiar sound. I am so very grateful and feel very blessed. Now it is time to get back in the studio. I spent a few days cleaning and tossing and evaluating my work. In the process of doing that, I painted this little 6x8 oil and it did not come easily. Painting is not like getting back on a bike.
In my humble opinion, French women are more restricted, for example, than American women. They're more conservative--which doesn't give them the mobility that we feel in life. Our American openness is a great gift that we often take for granted.
"Every day," he said, smiling. We all stood around, shifting our weight from foot to foot.
Some of you might recognize Miss T whom I've scrapped several times before. Her mother told me that the photo was taken last summer (2011) at the Swedish Royal family's summer residence Solliden which is on the island of Öland. A right royal tree in other words!
Highland Park, La Cuevita perfectly captures the Hispanic roots of
If the British public ever paused to take notice of anything other than the X-Factor, this week’s Soap operas or the latest developments in the unappetising saga of Tiger and the three skanks, (UPDATE: Make that eleven skanks) they might notice that some very troubling events are taking place amongst our allies across the channel, and indeed elsewhere.
Transformers: Prime – Darkness Rising (2010) – Starring Peter Cullen, Frank Welker, Steven Blum, Jeffrey Combs, Ernie Hudson, Sumalee Montano, Kevin Michael Richardson, and Dwayne Johnson.
Despite class being over, I've been kept busy with a few different jobs, like the one pictured above... being one of those awesome food samplers conveniently located in the crevices of your supermarket. But instead of having the usual baked good or yogurt cup I had to, get this, cook seafood.
It’s Called Gratitude, And That’s Right
Another score I made was this light for $15.
Bert Weedon would also appear frequently on television, particularly on children's shows such as Five O'Clock Club and Tuesday Rendezvous. He appeared on such shows as Thank Your Lucky Stars, The Dick Emery Show, The Golden Shot, and Chasing Rainbows. He also had his own, long running ITV series. In the Seventies he signed to Contour Records and released a series of albums. In the mid-Seventies he would top the British albums chart for one week with 22 Golden Guitar Greats, released on the Warwick label. He would continue to release albums into the Eighties.
The hadith of the Prophet said: “A Muslim is the brother of a Muslim.” He never said anything else. He never said the British and the Americans. He never said the blacks, the whites, the Chinese, the brown, the coconut, the coffee, the cappuccino. The yellow, the pink, the brown, the strawberry, the gateau. Nothing like that, No. He said: “The believers, they are a brotherhood.”
When he left you so abruptly the day after Christmas and after 2 months of cohabitation, that is when your alter ego returned…for about a week. Then you surfaced again, and have been hellbent on realizing YOUR dream at the expense of all others…and you want us to tell you that what you are doing is okay. As friends, we cannot…but as an audience, we are more than willing to sit back and watch this crap blow up in your face.
ABV=6.681%
(a flower she's never
"You alright in there mate?"
Be sure your life is filled with the Holy Spirit. God will give you discernment to see through the lies and tricks of Satan. Be full of Scripture and the things of God as a safeguard against the darkness that waits to deceive you.
- Spring 1965 takes LSD for first time
“Are you going to work Dad” G asked.
but we don’t have enough emotional energy to take a journey or have an adventure.
Then there were other issues. Clover was generally feeling low on confidence. So he had to play Robin Sharma’s speech on YouTube to pep her up. Holly on the other hand just did not want to work. So downloaded a whip cracker app on his mobile phone and used that to scare her to keep her in line. Then Iris was being bothered by flies. So Harvi downloaded the fly repellent app and used that to keep the flies at bay.
But it doesn't make it any less hard on me, on my mother. I know some of you have lost your fathers and I don't know which is worse--to lose them outright early or to watch them disintegrate into nothingness when they were the strongest person you ever knew.
Unlike Craigslist, whose founder Craig Newmark finally recognized the moral abhorrence of his site being used to sell children for sex, Backpage has expressed nothing but shamelessness. Perhaps that is because Craigslist didn’t need the revenue from its sex ad sales to survive. The Village Voice does.
The weird thing is everybody knows it and does nothing about it. Instead, they trust the media of all things to alert them and “get to the bottom” of what’s going on. That’s like asking the butler to tell us what his master is up to in his massive castle on the hill. “You rang? I’ll let the guvna know you called…”
Since it is almost impossible to be completely still for any amount of time, it is important to develop a fine controlled approach with shooting. One simple training exercise that will help develop a strong and controlled bow arm is the simple ball exercise.
Speaking of "guilty pleasures": Man, I really dig psychedelic hippie art. Alot.
3. Next, the story moves to the state-owned Al-Ahram where a secularist, anti-Islamist columnist named Amr Abdel Samea edtorialized that the Egyptian National Organization for Women were protesting this and a proposed law reducing the marriage age (which actually is advocated by some Islamists.) The link is in Arabic. It doesn't clearly cite a specific bill or any advocates of such a bill. It refers to "talk about" such a bill, but not specifying by whom. It's more a case of a rhetorical "if the Islamists have their way they're liable to do something this crazy."
Size: 14 1/2 inches, 2 pounds about the size of a cauliflower head
I’ve done two movies with Barbra, and I think I did four with Madeline all within 10 years. They were both wonderful. Everyone got along on What’s Up, Doc? All that was very nice.
Where Derry goes from here, we’ll have to wait and see, but like he said in his Sky Sports post-fight interview, “This is the biggest stepping stone in the world.”
I am glad this BM got me try those recipes.
It's that time of day again. I just put my little boy down for his nap and now I'm caught waging an internal battle. There are SO MANY things I have to do today. Some of them i have to get done today, and then there are a lot that I would just like to get done today, and then a few other things that I would just like to do, to have a moment to myself to breathe and relax.... the problem? I'm tired. Not just "a little sleepy", but completely worn out, feels like I've been working out with Jillian Michaels for 16 hours straight so far today....
so its like this then …..
Departures
towards barbarism
10. What inspired you to start blogging?
The issue is still awaiting a definitive answer (Robert, 1999 / Shaw, 2001 / Savitz, 2002).
- He did not threaten to not pay the senators and representatives or any of their staff
R2- (sc in 1sc, 2sc in next) around (9)
Though my feet aren't on the ground,
We had new friends over to play after lunch. It's great to be back in Milwaukee because everyone had kids while we were gone. So instead of being the only parents, we now have a great support group of others with kids and there are a lot of moms around during the day to have playdates with. Ingrid's not too sure of her new friends, she seems rather pushy with them--to see what she can get away with maybe? I don't know what it is, but with her old friends in Michigan she never seemed this bossy/grabby/pushy. Hopefully this too is a phase that she will quickly outgrow!
Xoxo Zizette
If you're interested in donating dictionaries to inmates, know that the Prison Book Program is buying 1,000 dictionaries at the wholesale price of $2.47. By donating less than it costs to buy a latte at Starbucks, you'll send a much-needed and much-appreciated dictionary to an inmate. Give up fancy coffee for a single week and you can send 10 dictionaries to folks who really need them. Besides, you can donate online with the click of a button.
He had been picked up in the town by police and claimed to be a 15-year-old Palestinian called Aziz Achaheb-Cedar.
The stew was really easy to make. It's very hearty, so you could probably add more coconut milk and water if you like your stews a bit thinner. My personal favorite was using the plantains. I originally bought them super green, but they had turned yellow. All the better! The plantains offered a pop of sweetness that cut through the creamy coconut milk base. I also love all the pea action going on. This was seriously good and filling.
I highly recommend this movie! I actually would not mind watching it again, which is not something I say very often. Usually once is plenty, and sometimes, I can't even bear to finish the movie at all.
I still remember how incredibly satisfying it was when I bit into the sandwich that first time. It surprises me every time just how good it is. Consistency is key and this place has been amazing every time.
But I love you all, no harm done.
You can win the following prizes:
I'm focusing on just getting the house together and trying to exercise every day and keep up on the dishes and laundry and such. I'm also trying to be ready for the possibility of Hurricane Irene coming through North Carolina. Today they think it will just brush the coast, so let's hope that the eastward trend continues and it misses us (and all the other states too!) and we can all be safe. If needed, though, I'll take the cats into my walk-in closet and close the door during the storm so we'll be all together and I can get them ready in carriers (well, carrier and duffel bag cause I can't afford to buy a 2nd cat carrier at this time heh heh) if we need to leave the house for any reason.
ND - Currently, the current rules of the SPL would apply which means that the SPL board has discretion to deal with an application for a transfer of the share to a newco. The new rules that were due to have been discussed today would have imposed certain sanctions on that transfer of share..
So now I need to have a nuclear scan of the thyroid. This involves being injected with a radioactive isotope . It will show the uptake by the thyroid and then we will go from there. After this test, I will go to an Endocrinologist.
Individual Huguenots had settled at the Cape of Good Hope from as early as 1671, but after a commissioner had been sent out from the Cape Colony in 1685 to attract further settlers, an organized, large-scale emigration of Huguenots to the Cape of Good Hope took place during 1688 and 1689, among them, as already mentioned, my mother’s ancestors from La Motte d'Aigues in Provence, fleeing from their country after the revocation of the Edict of Nantes.
sans hum no din or dint
I walk into the small cafe where I see blackboards above covered in multi-coloured chalk listing a variety of options for my hungry eyes. The cafe offers sandwiches and baguettes with fresh fillings as well as home-made dishes such as spaghetti bolognese or lasagne – but as delicious as they look, this is not exactly what I had in mind.
In 1992 again I watched in awe as I saw people rip apart the Berlin Wall.
when i would hold myself back
Is this what our country has been reduced to? In a shocking display of disregard for human life, a Richmond Heights woman died as a result of being denied medical treatment at Saint Mary’s Health Center.
Why are so many people in this business? Typically because they want to make more than what they used to earn. There are tons of reasons why a novice extends his or her efforts in real estate. Whatever the reason may be, be sure that you have a strategy. Knowing why you want to invest will give you sufficient reason that would want to encourage you to reach your goal, even if things aren’t going the way it is planned. The moment you are certain, you can create a strategy around your base, this will make it easier for you to reach your goal.
Let's get on to this weeks Top 5 picks from the DT, shall we? Before we do however, I have one other thing I have to mention... For all of our challenges please be sure to include at least ONE Cricut Cut (can be an SVG as long as it's cut with your Cricut) on your project or it will not be eligible for the Top 5 or the Winner of our sponsored prize (when applicable). This is very important as we are a Cricut Challenge blog! Thanks so much, Friends!
Walking to the subway, I pulled out the headphones and stuck the Allman Brothers in my ears. I’ve never been a fan, but suddenly, as I listened to Gregg Allman’s words, I understood something. Though I scribble furiously and mope meaningfully, these guys really said it better a long time ago. Life’s too short. So I ain’t wasting time no more.
99) So, what do you do for a living besides making guys excited and warm all over?
I tried using the string on my jumbo caterpillar kite, but the string wouldn’t stop wiggling around on account of that high wind blowing south.
“But now that the hour’s over, we can all go back to fucking the planet in its behind without guilt,” he continued, as he switched on all the available lights, electrical equipments, the engines of his gas-guzzling hot rods and pushed his apartment heater to max temperature.
So just leave a comment..........easy!!
Udasi conducts 50 to 60 deliveries a month while she maintains the track record of zero maternal mortality rate in Childa subcentre over the last five years.
I’m a Prophet, he’s a prophet, she’s a prophet
Going to the Dogs, indeed.
“Good good, I’m Klesha ; when Alexis told me about you being set up, we all decided to back you.”
Pinch salt
ball
I’m almost positive that Alexander Skarsgård killed God, stole his thunderbolts, and now whenever he looks at anyone or anything, invisible thunderbolts shoot out of his eyeballs. That is why they are that perverse shade of electricity-conducting blue. What you are seeing is actual electricity, he doesn’t even have irises, it’s just abhorrent forks of electricity coursing through his eyeballs. And what is with his hair? It is just way too golden. I have it on good authority that it’s not even real hair! Yeah, it’s true! My instincts tell me that it’s a freakish alien hybrid of gold and silk and if you touch it once, you’ll die. Of happiness.
(Above, Marie Louis of BUILD.)
Hi everyone, gosh...it's been such a long, long time now since I've been on my blog. Actually for that matter, my computer, hmm life itself. I hope that I even remember how to post! I do want to apologize to everyone for not being able to blog, bead, keep up with promises made from months ago. Also to create, design, keep up with all my blog sisters and with my blog itself.
crest and breast to hand me Psalms
Without further ado, I hereby declare this blog moved. Disqus will go off shortly and the comments will go to moderation. I thought about turning them off but I'll leave them on mod for a while in case of stray comments.
I have learned that accepting yourself means accepting ALL of you, the good and bad. It means letting yourself off the hook for all the things in the past, the things you can’t change, and moving on.
ER. Clearly gender is the topic of debate, do you think there is a lack of gender discourse in the realm of sound in art? If so, why do you think this is?
Pont l’Evêque
These are some of the bags that I recycled at my local grocery store....yes I said some.
It's good to be back...yeah!
tis the season....these two geckos were "joined together"....:)
It’s only the second ever quilt I’ve made and the hexagons were a challenge for me. I have no real flair for sewing, just bloody minded determination and sore fingers. Anyway, the piecing is done (yay!) and after ironing it tomorrow I can start the actual quilting. I’m only doing a basic pattern since I’m a beginner, so it won’t be as bad as the hexagons, at least I hope not.
Dr. Jianping Chen, Zhejiang Academy of Agricultural Sciences, China
We were tasked with providing full wireless coverage throughout the public areas of the venue as well as a selection of wired and wireless coverage in key areas for speakers, staff and crew. Support the keynote production and of course provide some technical equipment which included: Cisco switches, 4 x Xirrus arrays, 10 x laptops, a TMG server, printers and 1.2km of cat5 cable.
When I was writing All Fall Down, about a peasant family surviving the Black Death, I bought a book on fourteenth century peasants. It was very good. It was full of useful details such as the fact that medieval children were usually named after their godparents, and it was therefore not unusual to have siblings with the same name in a family. It had gruesome accounts of babies trampled to death by pigs, or burnt to death by chickens who picked up a smouldering piece of straw from the fire and dropped it in the cradle. It had a copy of the wedding vows (in which the woman promises to be bonere and boxom, in bedde and atte bord) and incantations against rats:
Other than that, the project pretty much proceeded as planned. It was hard to get everything I needed without attracting attention, but I figured it would all be over soon, and there wouldn’t be a thing CA could do about it.
So that's it! A well organized pantry. Is there anything more beautiful? My new pantry makes me so insanely happy, I find myself standing in there and just basking in the glory that is elfa. Quite a transformation if I do say so. I can hardly remember what the old disaster of a pantry looked like.
The High performing live, material from their debut album ''Somewhere Soon'' released in 1990 on London Records. If anyone have any info about place and date of this gig, please leave comment.
Lilee
I wish you didn’t have to care so much, and then my pain wouldn’t have to be your own. I wish I could give you a chance at a normal life. But I am far from normal, love, and so are you.
Now let me preface this with something that I don’t talk about often.
In my mind, I think I can do it ALL, somehow... Just get me out of this DAMN CHAIR!
You make what’s “necessary to maintain the infrastructure, to maintain the stature of the city” replied Avi Schick, acting president of the ESDC. “This is not a subsidy for economic development. It is maintaining and enhancing transportation.”
But I should keep quiet - listen for yourself and think of your own interpretations. In fact, tell them to me, right now, on the comments board. I'd like to hear from all of you.
This poem by Heaney though seems to straddle what I loved about Larkin and . . . I won’t say ‘hated’ but failed to connect with in Hughes, at least the Hughes I read as a teenager. There is a strong morality to ‘Death of a Naturalist’, not so much a moral per se, but it leaves me hanging in the same way that much of Larkin’s poetry does, though, especially ‘Mr Bleaney’.
When the fabric arrived I remeasured for a more accurate length. I cut the panels to size, giving myself about 1.5" longer than needed for hem length. then I ironed the hems around all 4 sides of each panel. Then I used white thread and sewed around each, so I had 4 rectangles hemmed on all sides.
And no gathering would be complete without food. We ended up with a sort-of-unintentionally-French theme, so we're thinking about having a different worldly theme each month. We had macarons, brie, croissants, dips, wine (duh), our favorite punch (hawaiian punch, sprite, and rainbow sorbet), and my favorite: pita bread (get it? Peeta bread, nyuk nyuk nyuk).
We walk in and see basically something like this:
Somehow my family prefers Smuckers.
3) If you've ever traveled in a country where people follow you around trying to sell you stuff...Cambodia is the absolute worst for people hollering, following and bargaining with you even if you don't want the stuff. I know how rock stars feel now.
It is no secret, Americans are unhealthy. Just look around you people are getting wider and sicker by the day. Shows like the Biggest Loser” are a hit because Americans are trying to find answers to many of their healthy issues. For the longest time I have believed that when it came to health it was really a matter of luck. Some people were lucky and had no health problems and others were unlucky and had all kinds of health problems. We have believed that diseases pick and chose people at random. Spiritually speaking their are very few voices who seem to believe that health and diet are related to the spiritual. We believe that God created a healthy World but once the fall came we basically had no more instructions on how to live our lives. Sadly I believe we have done ourselves a disservice in the church by believing that God has nothing to say about health. Not too long ago I believed this as well. I believed that my health really had nothing to do with God. But the more I try to understand God I have come to the realization that God is concerned about my health. Matter of fact I believe that many of the health problems we face today are a result of not understanding one word. Ownership. Let me see if I can simplify this by sharing my personal journey.
Saturday, I started coughing that cough that seems to come up from your ovaries. I also began to feel the pain between my shoulder blades that told me, "You are one sick little Indian." I still thought I might be recovered soon enough to show my husband a good time on his birthday. By Sunday, my hopes were being dashed as I looked and felt three-quarters dead.
And, yeah, it's the part of me that says "Ok" when my mom decides to make all of our Christmases themed from now to the end of eternity. New road, let's explore it.
The property had an immense barn with 12 " beams, lots of pigeons, a hay stack inside for great jumping and stored some of the farm equipment used by High School Ag classes. They grew mostly corn in the fields surrounding the barn. The Delaware Police push-mobile derby track was a relatively new feature used once a year for races; the rest of the year we had a private bicycle race track and sledding hill.
Since I had that, ahem, significant birthday a few months ago, I have been talking a lot of smack about cutting my hair off and donating it to charity and getting a whole new look for this whole 'middle aged' thing. I had T snap a photo, a control, if you will. Then... nothing. Six months later and nothing.
Whisk together flour, baking powder, baking soda and salt in a medium-sized bowl. Set aside.
Learning the technique of corridor evasion was something that I mastered. If I spotted a classmate walking towards me, I can expertly blend in with the crowd, and by the time she reaches the area where she thought I was, ready to greet me with that enthusiastic Hello Jasmine! I’d be safely hidden behind a group of people, amusing myself at the confused look on her face that says Now where did she go?
Jana here - I LOVE the ocean and all things associated with the ocean. I have always lived within a few miles of an ocean or sea. I am not sure I could ever live away from one. My youngest daughter and I carry our love of the sea around with us in the form of a turtle shaped birth mark. Mine is on my leg and hers is on her arm. I made a little piece of art for her bedroom to celebrate our common bond.
“Local residents said that they saw a white van without number plates near his home shortly before he disappeared. In the days leading up to his disappearance, Prageeth had told a close friend that he believed he was being followed,” he added.
Warren says he is doing this because he doesn’t “believe the Obama administration” and he wants to have proof that it is really his body. But, if he doesn’t believe President Obama and the United States Navy, why would the body be down there at all? If he thinks that they are lying, the most logical thing is to believe that they never buried the body at sea. But who knows, maybe Bill will prove himself right this time. Or maybe the body will not be there because Osama bin Laden is alive and well, playing cards and drinking mai tais with Elvis and Marilyn, in that secret government paradise island in the middle of the Pacific.
Feare the Norman doctores Namedrop & Benoit with their poultices of base metal
Did you know skin is the largest organ in the body?
It may only be me, of course, but all I see is a leaden text, oozing with smug, patronising clichés, chains of meaningless words which do nothing but parody themselves and their author.
Ignoring the distractions and delights
Total = $10.64
For the purposes of the document released to Brennan, there are four different income categories, as two low-income bands, up to 50% AMI, are conflated into one. (There are five income categories in the affordable housing Memorandum of Understanding.)
Despite our results we still maintain 90% turn out for training each week and 99% availability for matches. So we must be doing something right.
It was as if your month was saying, I need you, I want you, I am yours
Tim Burton (who despite his prominence on these lists is not by a long shot my favorite director) has a way of showing that special hell that is suburbia…one of those ways is perhaps the most atrocious color scheme for painting houses you could ever imagine. And I could probably go for quite a long time on the darker side of this film with it rather vicious, though accurate, critique of the failings of human beings and society.
I should probably mention at this point that somehow, whether on accident or not, every drunk attending Medieval Times that night was on the red team.
US 7, 8, and 10
I am not a monster. My body is not monstrous.
Out of the ash
Edward Norton (Everyone Says I Love You, The People Vs. Larry Flynt, Primal Fear)
Within 3 weeks, we went from "we're not even looking" to "OMG, WE'RE MOVING TO CALIFORNIA!!!"
Vision’s commodious cabin will provide seating for five adults and two children. Top speed is expected to be around 300 KTAS and max range is targeted at close to 1,000 nm. However, the aircraft will be limited to a 500 lb. payload with max fuel, and thus there will be significant range versus payload tradeoffs. Slow speed performance should be a strong suit, providing easy handling in the landing configuration and short runway requirements.
Have you heard of it?
Katniss is from District 12, which is very poor. She and Gale hunt outside the district borders, which is illegal, but they are not punished because the town officials like to buy their meat and fruit on the black market. They dream of running away, knowing they can fend for themselves, but know they cannot because their families depend upon them for survival. Katniss’ mother was mentally incapacitated when her father died, and she has been taking care of her 12-year-old sister Primrose for years.
Level 21: Weapon ATT: +21, Accuracy: +7%, Proc Rate: 56%, Deals 223% damage 2 times.
My feet and back hurt so I think it is time to sit down!
After a while the finish goes really weird, even though it feels really drying it starts to look 'slimy'. It also begins to settle into every tiny line and crack in my lips, it's not very flattering. It makes my lips look very old and wrinkly and sometimes forms little 'balls' of pigment in the lines. It's weird because they all just seem to make my lips look worse instead of better. It's most obvious when i stretch my lips in a smile. If you have any dry or flaky skin on your lips this will show it up and Cosmopop and D'lilac look very chalky.
From My Heart To Yours! Happy Creating & Swapping! Hugs,Tee
To this end, a high level commission has already been constituted with former Afghanistan president and spiritual leader Prof Sibghat Ullah Mujaddadi as its chief.
True, we didn't have Vampirella or Ghoulardi, but we did have Cassandra Peterson, AKA Elvira, that well-endowed Mistress of the Dark who jiggled in all the right places and whose combination of somehow-innocent sexual imagery and B-Movie feature presentations kept many an adolescent up late nights, for more than one reason.
The Holy Place
Though the Co-op Telephone Company has never been an Eckert industry, early settlers on Surface Creek Mesa owed their phone service to two far-seeing men, H. K. Ferguson of Eckert and Eugene Hubbard of Cory. In 1900 they secured the first franchise to build a phone line from Delta to Eckert, Cedaredge, and the lakes on Grand Mesa. This franchise was later sold to the Co-op Telephone Company, which had been organized in the Paonia-Hotchkiss Country.
I give thanks to my deceased Pioneer turntable for the afternoon it spent playing both sides the 12″ single of Far Gone and Out by The Jesus and Mary Chain that I bought half-price in Woolworths in King’s Heath. It played them over and over again.
Jason Mraz also check out my nails! He knew what each one meant and was impressed with my version of fan art. For reference, click here for a link to my Jason Mraz nails.
This month there was only 3 families present, and one was a new mom. Other months there are 6 or more families, most of us 'regulars'.
Claw marks and upturned earth around a burrow
"Frida Kahlo to Marty McConnell"
It will be a while before I wear this blue blouse again.
That's what I intend to do. I am in Manila all week for work!
Healthy people also experience difficulty breathing when exposed to ozone pollution. . . . Millions of Americans live in areas where the national ozone health standards are exceeded.
That’s the first part of our faith. It is, in fact, our part of faith. We must do the believing. Our souls are ours, free to respond to God as we wish, and our Faith as Christians is our choice to respond to God’s revelation with belief. Faith is saying “Yes, I believe you” to God.
Full Written Complaint in PDF with Greater Detail available at:
(They didn’t have wristbands, which made me upset!!)
“Plus, I’m sure we have some plastic knives around here somewhere,” said Bowers. “Those things have really nasty serrated edges. Or we could sharpen the ends of the wooden coffee stirrers to make cute little spears. Oh, I have so many ideas for this — it’s so exciting.”
When I grabbed my purse to make sure I had some cash with which to tip the massage therapist, I discovered my small, adorable pink metallic wallet that I bought in Portland last summer was missing. I fuh-REEEKED out. I immediately got in my car and flew back to the grocery store, asking the cashier in the lane I'd gone through if she'd seen it (no), the Front End Manager if it had been turned in (no) and the store manager if it had been turned in (also, no). My freak out continued. I am generally good in a crisis, say, if you cut the tip of your finger off and need to get to the hospital or if I back in to a police car when leaving a parking space. Cool as a damn cucumber. However, when I lose stuff that's important to me...stuff that I need RIGHT THAT MINUTE, I lose. My. Shit. I literally had to pop a Xanax just to deal. I immediately called the spa and cancelled my appointment (how would I pay them? My gift certificate was only going to pay for a portion of my services), and that just bummed me out even more because my gift certificate was expiring the next day. Then I ran to the bank to cancel my debit card and get issued a new (temporary) one. Then I got online and on the phone and started canceling credit cards. Thankfully, I don't have but a couple, but it was still a pain in my ass. I looked at my calendar, trying to figure out when the hell I was going to have time to deal with getting a new driver's license--a fate almost as horrible as having to go to the Social Security office for...well, for anything. And the whole time I'm going through all of this, I'm thinking to myself, "Where the fuck IS that damn wallet?!" I don't like it when stuff doesn't make sense--you know, like algebra and when wallets seemingly disappear in thin air. I was in a shitty, shitty mood for the rest of the day.
Hamsters are gangsta. Remember it.
David Gordon makes many points in this book that intrigued me:
1 can (15 oz.) black beans, rinsed
Have you guessed?
So the car is still dead with no cash to repair it at the moment, the washer is dead so can't do laundry, then some small appliances went as well...food processor and popcorn machine. And, as many know, we have been fighting with the cable company for 3 years about our service which caused me not to have internet at home for over a year. Well it's still not fixed, they have given up on trying but have also given up giving us credits for lack of service so I have given up paying for service that doesn't work. so we once again face it all being turned off but it doesn't work reliably so it's not a huge loss. so my weekly blogging may have to be from work, which is fine i can do so and can bring in photos to post as needed.
Just when I think there is nothing anyone can do to top Gary Bettman and company, Bud comes back swingin'.
“We did not wish to harm anyone,” says Olein, “but to stop an act that would lead to a false war and a nuclear weapons exchange.”
Stockpile Item to Donate: Carmex Moisturizing Lip Balm and True Shimmer Tropical Chapstick
“How does he expect him to pick us up? We can’t survive!” said Private Tran, the navigator. (Luu liked to call her a navigatrix.)
Norman Campbell, John McDermott, Robert N. Parrish, Pennywell Folsom, Ashley Lawson, Edwin D. Shanks, West Roundtree and others were among those going to the battle from around Troupville.
McCoy: 447 runs, 3.6 YPC, 4.5 TD%
I have been fortunate to have the computer at my disposal ALL day! The gratification of staying in touch with friends, making new friends, keeping up with family, "googling" information on anything and everything makes this world a nicer place. It's just so peaceful to be at home and doing those things...and eventually getting housework done. Ummm..."honey" I will.....
Mr. Palm has already admitted that he could only find three Catholic institutions in the US that teach full biblical inerrancy.
This disgusting show of über opulence is so crude that over the top does not quite describe it. Over the top is an understatement. I actually had to text my teenagers to see if this was a real show or if it was made up? Apparently, it’s real. Real if you live in a fantasy land, on another universe, in another galaxy. After watching this show it seems that Michael Jackson’s Neverland was nothing more than a quaint and cozy little shack.
So take heed, my fellow bakers, to those little tips and let's get the party started shall we?
We’re off to the Flinders Ranges today so must go and do some more packing. We can’t find the Trangia, which is really annoying.
There are a lot of really wonderful posts here and I hope that this serves as an excellent resource that you can pass on to your friends! Enjoy!
I'd just spent half an hour flailing about on the treadmill. I was red-faced, sweaty and exhausted from my attempts to shed a bit of winter fat - and here was the gym offering me a chocolate bar as reward for my efforts.
You might have heard me on BBCRadioFour recently, arguing for an historical theme park version of Pompeii to be built near the site. Why on earth should we do such a thing? Here are ten reasons I think it would be a great idea.
Until then - he's got a great place.
If light therapy has been prescribed for the treatment of SAD, it typically begins in the fall months as the days begin to shorten, and continues throughout the winter and possibly the early spring. Patients with a long-standing history of SAD are usually able to establish a timetable or pattern to their depressive symptoms, and can initiate treatment accordingly before symptoms begin.
So… does that mean you believe in ghosts?
The other popular theory blames the murders on members of the country’s large ethnic Albanian minority.
We direct, challenge and work with students to put their work in the best possible position for audiences. We also allow students the time and freedom to choose some stories of their own to pursue. But through our experience we can create teaching moments along the way. Our student staff has been wonderful to work with. They’ve been engaged, energized and professional.
Overall a very nice card of McCovey that helps commemorate his time with the San Diego Padres.
But mostly I know that we are to desire our heavenly home above this earthly one.
I've become interested in learning how to weave. Unfortunately, there is a significantly larger start-up cost to this particular hobby and I just don't feel right investing that sort of money while I still have unfinished business connected to previously learnt crafts. I remembered a post I read on The Yarn Harlot's blog last year and decided to tweak it for myself and my UFOs.
Oh Dawn, HELP!! I discovered Starbucks last week (yes, I think I was the last person on the planet). I had the Peppermint Mocha Twist Espresso and I am TOTALLY addicted. I have spent hours thinking about this dumb drink and too much money already! Rumor had it that General Foods Intl. makes a mix but I've struck out at 3 stores. Who makes Peppermint Mocha creamer? If I just added it to coffee will it taste similar to the Starbucks espresso? Thanks...I'm desperate to find a cheaper version.
I started this blog to weigh in on my life and keep myself accountable and maybe help others along the way.
until then, eat and of course, enjoy!
Preheat oven to 325 degrees F. In a large skillet over med-high heat, combine sausage, chicken, Cajun seasoning and sage. Cook until chicken and sausage is no longer pink. Remove meat from skillet using slotted spoon and set aside. Saute onion, celery, bell pepper and garlic until tender. Remove from heat and sstir in cooked meat and one container Alfredo sauce.
The two of them sat in the fading light of the living room without speaking for another hour. Laura pulled the throw over her shoulders to keep herself warm, while Hayley tossed the thawing packet of peas into the empty fruit bowl on the table. Neither of them looked at one another, instead casting their eyes around the old family room, resting every now and again on memorable features of their respective childhoods, more often than not recalling the exact same experience, just from a different perspective.
My second week I was working with Rosie King, producer for Malcolm Boyden, the drive time show for BBC Coventry and Warwickshire. Since St. Valentine’s was near, today she wanted me to do a piece along those lines but be creative, as well. So I found this article (on the right) where apparently men who kiss their wives everyday live five years longer than those who don’t. Rosie loved the idea and she wanted me to find a guest and set him or her up to talk on the topic. This was challenging for me because previously I have never worked with ENPS to a point where I had to set up for a programme so it was quite tricky (only used it to type in notes and send messages). I observed and asked questions and I quickly got a hang of it.
“Oh, right! Thanks for taking the time to explain that! Now I completely understand the message you were trying to convey to me about your girlfriend’s choice in sexual enjoyment equipment!”
Sriram Raghavan has given us a glimpse of his potentials with the brilliantly directed Johny Gaddar. Agent Vinod might not be able to be classified as a deserving sequel to Johny Gaddar but it at least is a league ahead compared to the kind of cinema one is being presented with these days.
According to a British journalist, WT Stead, the concentration camps were nothing more than a cruel torture machine. He writes: "Every one of these children who died as a result of the halving of their rations, thereby exerting pressure onto their family still on the battle-field, was purposefully murdered. The system of half rations stands exposed and stark and unshamefully as a cold-blooded deed of state policy employed with the purpose of ensuring the surrender of people whom we were not able to defeat on the battlefield."
Cindy's notes: I used frozen strawberries which I thawed on the stove, with a Tbs of sugar. I let the berries cook for 4 minutes and mashed them with a wooden spoon. Then I strained the juices, to use as a syrup. I also omitted the cottage cheese, doubled up on the cream cheese and used strawberry yogurt.
Ian ran through some examples of OS Open Data being used in applications. One that sticks in my mind is the iCoast app which I’ve seen before and really impressed me. If you haven’t seen it before, it’s well worth a look, and may well come in handy if you’re around the Dorset coastline.
Of course, the ending is what’d made me cried. Who needs to fly to England to see “Rome and Juliet” when right here, in our Asia has already had so many touching movies such as Hsui Xien and Susu’s. Romeo dies and Juliet comes after. If there were haven, they would be together forever. But in the “Green snake”, there’s more than that. Beside the lesson of mercy, love still remains mainly. Demon and human still can be together, so should there be any stupid reasons that can separate love? In the end, Susu (a.k.a the White snake) is locked in a tower and will never be able to get out because of all the crimes she made which were to be able to be with Hsui Xien. Eventually, they still can be together. She will forever be locked in and he shall sweep the leaves outside of the tower forever, ever, for a thousand year more…
Verse 4 and 5:
Start supper.
Then you will try out the different methods and see that both work but in different ways and that way you will close more deals and get a bigger commission and a happier boss.
In traditional American culture, masks are often worn during festive celebrations, occasions or as simple decorations, wall hangings and museum displays. But, Native American masks are not taken lightly by the Native people. Their use is reserved only for sacred ceremonies and rituals. Only a select few are honored with permissions to wear them. Native American masks are as varied as the tribes themselves, their ceremonies and their beliefs. The creatures that they depict are highly personalized and the materials used to make them are unique to the individual tribes and their geographical locations.
RODRIGUEZ: Promised you?
This is a picky topic within the black community. Tyler Perry has an incredible rags’ to riches story of going from being homeless to arguably the most recognized African American writer/director of current times. He does a lot for his community, is a God fearing man and for the most part a positive influence. I’m all for that. But in the end, it doesn’t make up for his lack of range in films.
It is not my fault that I did not notice the huge, almost billboard-sized sign right next to where we queued, which asked that people take off their shoes before getting on the bouncy castle. Nor did I realise that at the grand old age of twenty-five I should clearly not have been on the contraption meant for children 15 years and under. I can’t help it if I look fourteen! Besides I just wanted to have some fun. Anyway, it was a good day. It could have been worse.
I encourage all my students to blog.
But you don’t love me.
Posters with catchy phrases like “Bai Mao bu tao, ren min chi cao” (if Taib won’t go, the people will eat grass) have gone up in town.
After our short visit there, we walked to the Arc de Triomphe. Tim just told me we have to walk to the top...
Rabbi Eli Ben Haim’s source for the cash was an Israeli who, for a fee of 1.5 percent, supplied the cash through intermediary cash houses run by a host of Talmudic accomplices.
Poor old Andre Villas-Boas
I follow, twenty Springs behind.
What'd you get this weekend? Anything good? What kinds of untold treasure do you have in your attic/closets/storage? Do tell!
The Men of the Lion
Actor, Voice of Homer Simpson
Corona
Zoie has decided she wants to sleep in the chair all night!!! For 2 nights she has been so a sleep when I was ready to go to bed I couldn't wake her to put her in her crate. She was real god. She has stayed in her chair all night both nights!!! Maybe letting her stay in her chair will help save her mattress and save me from having to keep making covers for the mattress that she tears up at least one a week!!!! YAYAYAA
HUNTED: Faceless monsters pursue and attack a young teen at her summer job.
The Blues aren’t just about bad times; they’re about everything that happens in life. Joy, frustration, and relationships are all part of what Honeyboy and the true Bluesmen express through their music. What’s unique about him is that he hasn’t musically changed with the times. Sure, he plays an electric guitar some of the time now, but if you close your eyes you could be in a Southside Chicago tavern in 1952, or a juke joint hidden off Highway 61 in the 30s. After opening his Kachina show with (I think) Muddy Waters’ Rollin’ Stone, Edwards played the standard Sweet Home Chicago before being joined by Michael Frank on harmonica for the rest of the set. After about forty-five minutes, Honeyboy put down his guitar and talked about some of the people he played with in the past, and answered a few questions from the crowd before taking a break.
the little mind, the clinging flesh—the need to know
At least that’s my plan as of now.
This video gives you an exclusive look at the song "War" from the upcoming "SATCHURATED" release. This is the FIRST 3D THEATRICAL CONCERT FILM release with brilliant 7.1 Dolby Surround Sound and will present the ultimate cinematic experience that you don't want to miss! This promotional clip is presented here in 2D.
The butcher takes the 100 Euro note, and runs to pay his debt to the pig farmer.
so what might be madisoncary’s early birthday wish?
One day training- NYS Notary Association approved
16. Ornette Coleman - Theme from A Symphony (excerpt)
brings in a circus catch
Just because you are true, I begin to like you.
the dark ideas come to a light
Sunday morning was misty. Dad and I decided to make it special by trying out Piatti's brunch. Piatti's is just around the corner from us in Mill Valley. We arrived a few minutes after their opening at 10:00, and were told that we were their first guests of the day. Naturally we had a choice spot by the window!
38. Toccata And Fugues In D-Minor - Hallmark
LET’S GET READY TO STUMBLLLLLLEEEEEEEEEEEEE!
I have to confess that reading reviews of our album 'LoveTel Motel' gives me a real sense of pleasure and achievement. After all, making this album was a real labour of love for all of us involved - including Ian Jackson our engineer and sometimes 'fifth' Magic Shipper. I would say that everybody seems to like different things about it and as far as I am concerned, everybody will have their own take on each of the songs and what their own particular favorites are. And why not? That, after all, is why we make music to put out into the public domain. It is not my place to argue with somebody else's personal taste, especially if they have been gracious enough to purchase our record, and for that (I am certain that I also speak on behalf of the rest of the lads) we are immensely grateful.
Adding a little "do-it-yourself" art to round party ideas for a jewel that brings him home, you may want to some good-sized, 42 inch blow up guitar rock star. These can be designed and decorated with permanent markers or stick on gems.
Unbeknownst to him, he completely altered the course of a life that day, and consequently, every life that I have touched since.
Present tense: Lay
you have held vigil in the murky depths
I don't inherently mind the rain. In fact, I enjoy being out in the rain from time to time. It cleans things off, it cools things down in the summer, it brings out the beautiful green that surrounds the city (once it's abated).
He said: “Kids know the difference between an online world that feels safe and one that doesn’t.”
If you don't have a pasta machine for rolling out clay just substitute a rolling pin (that you will never use with food again).
Whew! I have just completed my essay for the 2012 World Nomads Travel Writing Scholarship. Writing comes so naturally to me, and I did not anticipate that this would be any difficult. What I didn’t expect to be hard, however, was the character count.
When coverage does happen, more than once, I’ve seen broadsheet reviews give more criticism to the train service north than the show itself. Other alleged reviews are in fact opinion pieces about culture as a regeneration tool or the social and economic problems of any given region. Interesting topics that I have written about myself, but so often the exhibition itself is forgotten, as regions are used as mere fodder by metropolitan writers to peddle one ideology or another. I notice that coverage of shows at Tate Britain or the Serpentine in London does not tend to feature much comment on the latest tube strike or deprivation in Tower Hamlets.
Today’s forecast in my area of the country calls for a high temperature around 85 degrees. Tomorrow is projected to be 88, with the following day topping out in the low 90s. For me, it’s too damn hot already, and it’s only the end of May.
originally i had wanted to get him all dressed up in suspenders and tie and fedora (who am i kidding? i would never put that much work into dressing my kid! lol) but didn’t have time to get those things so i thought, ‘well, at least he’ll enjoy the tie’.
“Hey girls, before you know it the pool will be ready and you’ll be digging out the swimsuits!”
If you don’t know your limits or you feel like challenging a harder series, then don’t be discouraged if you find it extremely difficult. But if you’re like me and hate to give up, then you better find someone who can handle that level of difficulty and is ready to check your translations – otherwise you’ll end up making lots of mistakes you don’t even realize, and you won’t progress because you don’t know what you did wrong.
As he returned home, he was reminded of the event that had taken his thumb
easiest in a mono-culture. Diversity tends to undermine order and, as much
Sorry I haven't been able to give you 100 % with the blog lately... scary, end of term uni deadline on monday...
In the Fall of 2008, WACAP adoption agency began to send e-mails out to many adoption groups pleading for a new group of older orphans who needed families. "They are all listed as healthy," the broadcast e-mail read, "They are in danger of turning 14 and 'ageing (sic) out.' This means they may have no support or resources and have to live on their own in China - if they are not adopted before they turn 14." This particular group would become known as the first "Journey of Hope" program through WACAP, one of the largest China adoption programs in the U.S. Emails went out and word spread through the Yahoo groups discussing WACAPs new program, which included the Luoyang orphanage adoption group, where adoptive families were advocating for children "soon to be aging out" of that orphanage, which comprised the majority of the children on WACAP's list. One Luoyang adoptive parent wrote of "a program that was to get older kids adopted. Perhaps there is a new effort to get the older kids paperwork ready and have files in at CCAA. Maybe, they are being added to CCAA's new 'shared' list. Thirty or so agencies are now being 'tested' with the new 'shared' list of older or sn kids."
Some of the most popular hashtags right now are:
Arjuna refers now to what we call Bhagavad-Gita. His mind is drawn to find solace now in Kṛṣṇa’s excellent instructions regarding death and the temporary nature of the world.
This is a silent film, so be warned. And because it's a silent film, they have a music score that runs under the film. I found the score to be super annoying but the footage made it worth while to watch.
* 1/2 teaspoon salt
Melton S. Ambel, 82, of Naples, FL and formerly of Batavia, IL, died in his summer home in Fontana, WI on September 8, 2010 after a long, courageous battle with cancer. Melt was born in Aurora, IL to Melton and Augusta Ambel. As a child, he enjoyed playing the saxophone in the East Aurora High School band. After graduation, he enlisted in the U.S. Army, where he served in the Korean War. Melt founded Chapple West, Inc. , a pre-engineered building franchise which he owned for over 40 years. He had many hobbies and interests including love of art and music, sailing, skiing and golf. A stroke of luck seemed to follow him (two “holes-in-one”), but Melt worked hard at everything he did; including all the great friendships that he made over the years. He attended the Vanderbilt Presbyterian Church in Naples, FL and was a member of both Pelican Marsh and Big Foot Country Clubs.
Most kids love to be scared! I honestly believe that. They love ghost stories, they love monsters and grisly tales from history. Again, I think that, as we grow up, we tend to misremember ourselves as children. We picture innocent little beams of sunshine – fragile beings that can be shattered by the slightest upset. Once again I say – rubbish! I’ve now taken the Witchfinder Tour around lots of schools and, let me tell you, as soon as we get down to the grisly business of executing and torturing witches the room comes alive! They love it. And if a minority of parents have a problem with that, well, I’m sorry, but I think their constant fretting and nannying will do more to warp their children than a stray (fictional!) vampire or zombie ever could!
So, to deal with my own head, I have decided to get the brushes out… or at least I will do when what I have started has dried!
All renewable season tickets, as well as single game tickets to the aforementioned games ordered by March 31 will be filled. Priority requirements will be released on www.georgiadogs.com as soon as they are determined.
eaten! @danji
If only she would see her own contradictions, of claiming bravery, but applying cowardice. Of declaring love, but showing hate. Of displaying passion, but exhibiting chaos. Of shallow pretensions, but a desire for greatness.
Tackle: We spent most of the trip casting 10wts thru 12wts with either sinking or intermediate lines (Rio Outbound Shorts work very well). The MCO team carries a bunch of rods already prepped to fish so its not a bad option.
Streamlining to affect approvals for major projects
Some of the many things that bring me joy are:
Stand Out Dream Sequence: This being a Ken Russell film, what else can you expect but crazy messed up dream sequences? I can’t even start to explain the dream sequences on this film because they are surreal to the extreme, but I’ll leave it at this: you’ll see Jesus Christ with a goat head that has six eyes! How’s that for a whacked out dream sequence?
Everyone has their "place" where they feel the most creative and do most of their writing. These workshops may not appeal to everyone, but when I saw her website, I knew that attending one is something I will strive for.
Saturday morning found me at the bank where I got a credit card advance to cover the "held" funds in my checking account. On Saturday afternoon I had an apologetic phone call from the check writer and the re-assurance that he would send another one immediately.
Goal 5) To help them discover who God made them to be. It’s not all about us, yet God has gifted each one of us to serve him in unique ways. We want to help our kids identify and develop the ways He’s equipped them to serve Him – while they are still at home and have the freedom to explore. You can read more about that in Living for Jesus ~ Stewarding our Children’s Gifts and Talents.
We are changing guard on the bridge.
that on that day,
It is important for the community to come together and discuss the problems shared within the community. It is more important to generate action items aimed at solving the problems we have endured for so long.
This is the first year for the phlox to bloom and it looks happy.
Yeah...
The funny thing is, I totally understand why people are feeling sorry for us. Over the last few years, when I heard that some family was going to quit cruising, I felt deep sadness for them. Even if I knew nothing about their circumstances or their plans. I just felt sad for them. I must have annoyed at least a few of them with misplaced sympathy. I'm sorry. Now I get it. When it's time to go home, it's not a sad thing. Sure, it's a challenge, it can be hard. But it is not a death or a failure. It's a rebirth. A new beginning. I love those. That's why I love spring, and the new flowers just coming up. The sky is the limit.
The liberals are hypocrites...and like I said early, they are being exposed daily by those smart enough to turn off the Daily Show and Saturday Night Live
When that happens, we are nothing and everything at the same moment, for no dividing line can be drawn between the authentic self and anything the mind labels as “other.”
Reach out to those around you in love and forgiveness. More importantly, reach out to God! Embrace Christ. Allow Him to do what is needed in your life to take control of the rhizomes of sin and bring them back within His boundaries.
Meralco Bolts (4-5)
I’m talking about Half Prince, it’s written by a Chinese woman called Yu Wo , and the first time that I saw the manga (because I didn’t realize that there was a novel), I was hooked. It is funny and has blood and all that good stuff, but the most important thing about it is that the main character is a woman and plays online videogames. Oh and this is worth mentioning but in the game she plays, Second Life, she plays as a beautiful male character called Prince, 40% more beautiful than your average male *wink*.
During our New Year walk to the (frozen) canal Junior spotted a discarded crisp packet lying in the snow. This was the conversation that followed - a somewhat typical exchange of words with a curious 6 year old boy:
I have some more anthology news today.
I feel like I'm confusing the hell out of myself, let alone other people who might decide to follow me. First it was tangobaby. Then TangobabyinSF on twitter. i live here:SF for the eponymous site. femmefotographie for my "real" website. And now Julie Michelle on CALIBER.
"I d-ddd-on't even like sea-----weed!!!"
When Mrs R was at primary school, where she shared her classroom with various species of literate dinosaurs, she was taught about apostrophes. It doesn't seem to happen these days, ever, otherwise how can so many adults splatter their writings with random apostrophes?
After sweltering days and soaring temperatures it really made the weekend special. I can see colorful bundles of joy playing football or cricket in the small open patches in the colony. Here at home another round of coffee has begun and there is a sense of calm all around
I hope you all have a great Thursday!!
Friends can use them to keep up with one another’s hangouts,
The event is on July 21st, so there’s some time to get $250 raised for each of us. We have until the end of August to turn in donations. Since we’ve already met our donation minimums for ACT, we decided it was another good cause we’d like to support.
While he makes several acceptable arguments – even sarcastically proposing the next film “sell off naming rights to his iconic codename – he could ditch the 007 moniker and become simply Agent Emirates” – Olmstead certainly never faults the moviemakers for their decision. And, as it turns out, neither does Daniel Craig, the actor presently playing the iconic British spy.
'Bugs are for outside....and NO, we cannot save them in a jar and keep them on the dining room table....because it causes an instant panic attack for your mother.'
One might assume by the title of this book that this Cave's memoir of writing for the pulps. But it is not a memoir in the true sense of the word. But both Jacobi and Cave wrote such finely detailed letters about their day-to-day activities as writers and dealing with publishers that in many ways it's better than a memoir.
My second find was this simple linen shirt (heart be still) and this gorgeous fluttery black skirt that fits like a glove. No alterations needed! When I tried on the linen shirt I fell in deep deep love. It's simple and light weight. Perfect for layering or for summer! The construction is pretty simple, I think I may make myself a few more of these tops in different fabrics.
His reply… ‘Simply’.
The rattling showers rose on the blast;
Writer: “Oh, yeah, sorry. ‘God’ is ‘good.’ In this draft, ‘god’ is ‘good.’ See, to save time carving out the extra O’s I just shortened it for this draft. I did it throughout the tablet. Yeah yeah I’ll go back and put all the O’s back in later. It ain’t like anyone’s going to read this as it is…”
AdriN2001: I can't explain how I feel
Potato, even though that's kind of a cop-out vegetable. But I've never EVER met a potato I didn't like. Next in line? Spinach. Fruit? Those little tangerines that are in season right around Christmas time...Cuties? I could eat 10 of those a day.
After I tried on a shirt and was buttoning it, I came out of the booth and my mom said ‘Oh, you look good in that’
She tried to move but couldn’t. The men’s grip on her increased again, fingers pressing hard into her arms, bruising her. The drop fell, landing on her tongue, and another quickly followed it. The hooded man tightened his fist and more dripped into her mouth. She tried not to swallow, didn’t want to taste his blood. It slid down her throat, one drop after another, until she wanted to be sick.
of long grass
Live a life filled with love, following the example of Christ. He loved us and offered himself as a sacrifice for us, a pleasing aroma to God.
When it came, I quickly opened it up and plugged it in. That was about it! Super easy peasy setup!
Score: 4.5 out of 5
I saw old friends I hadn't seen in ages. One of them it's been over 12 years and she hasn't changed a bit. The other whisked me away to a speakeasy in Soho. I tasted two cocktails themed on tea, amazing, and after ate some of the best food I have ever eaten in London at a little
He was also a man who stood up for his beliefs. Since becoming a Christian, whenever there was an argument in the government or courts that could affect how we worship and what we believe, the first person I always heard stand up was Chuck Colson. He fought the good fight we should all be fighting but many of us are too afraid to. He was unafraid of what people said and what people thought. He was fighting for a greater purpose.
I am working on a new post that discusses our inspiration behind our popular Dog Silhouette Pillow. Stay tuned…
Holy cycle be
I wish you all good health and good food - and look forward to staying in touch as Cooqi launches anew.
Score: Carrie-Ann=7, Len=6, Bruno=7 for a total of 20 and a grand total of 54
Correspondent: Why the aversion to horses?
Elvis / Elvis? / means bi-sexual
Diane’s coop is just faced with mesh “chicken wire on steroids” and at first I thought there was NO WAY this would keep the animals warm enough to survive our hard, Northern Ontario winters. The idea behind an open air chicken coop is that it keeps the birds in better health, less congestion (ever heard a chicken sneeze? Funny shit, that) less bacteria, less illness, fresher air, healthier birds.
Joy – Does my disposition express joy even when facing adverse circumstances?
Develop your career is the blog from The Careers Group, University of London. One of their recent posts showed how you can break from the norm and do something different with your cv and how you present yourself.
Now we must start the fightback.
worst part about these fries is that they consider what’s in the box 2 servings. i don’t know about you, but when it comes to fries i order 2 large knowing people will want to pick at my fries and still get pissed when they ask. that amount of fries is in no way, shape, or form a shareable amount, even if you are a caring person.
I will be focusing on 3D modelling for this project as it is the skill I feel I need most practice in. Attempting this project will further develop my skills in modelling and hopefully have me on the way to acquiring the necessary skills for the second year of my degree. The character and weapon will originate from my idea in the Intro. to Games Design module of this semester in which we were asked to design an RPG game. I will use sketches and tools such as Photoshop to demonstrate how I want my character to look in the overall finished piece. This will be my first individual attempt at texturing the finished 3D model and the first individual attempt at UV Mapping.
And it seems her addiction to having the perfect shoes for each occasion has turned it into a profession as Cheryl collaborated with online fashion website stylistpick.com designing a range of shoes.
Wow, it's been two months - TWO WHOLE MONTHS! - since I've written on my blog. It seems my passion for blogging has all but disappeared, I'm sorry to say. I'll keep it - I've met so many great people this way, and there's too much writing on here to just hit the delete button and banish it forever, but posting has been spotty at best and unless I have a sudden change of heart, I doubt that will change. I'm on Facebook - not a lot, but I'm there. And I'll be speaking at the UWWG in Ohio and Life is Good in May - perhaps we'll meet up?
Well hello there! It's been so long since posting here, I almost forgot how. And my poor neglected camera... I didn't take a single from the end of June until late September. But I thought I'd pop in to share what little bits are in my photo file. See you again soon I hope.
When Iain told me that the group would be walking up the Terrible Torrence hill, I just shrugged and agreed. Last year, that hill was a total shock. I thought the run would just be out and back Columbia Parkway. Imagine my surprise when, with the city skyline looming ahead, we took a right, up an incredibly steep hill, only to turn around and run right back down it again. I remember feeling like I might collapse on the way down the hill. My legs had totally turned to jelly. This year, after a fast walk up the hill, I felt great on the downhill and was able to use it to my advantage instead of feeling like I might fall on my face.
So when a writer begins her book with Biff hanging over a shark tank surrounded by ninjas, two major steps in a scene have been skipped. Normal World serves an important function. It is part of narrative structure for a reason. Thus, when a writer totally skips some fairly vital parts and thrusts us straight into disaster, I already know the author will likely rely on melodrama from this point on. Why? Because that was how she began her book.
What I have lost with what I have gained,
I read this quote recently, from a book I’ll review later on this blog. The author wrote it in the context of suffering and the meaning of suffering, but I think it applies in daily life as well.
* I was in such a hurry that I forgot to look up and missed saying hello. I wasn’t angry or stuck up, just busy.
Super-Bowl barf-fest.
He takes her hand in his and gently brushes his thumb over her knuckles. She takes a deep breath, though it’s barely audible to a passerby, for him, it’s a joy to hear, knowing she is waking up to another gorgeous day. The beeping on the nearby monitor keeps a steady rhythm showing that her heart is keeping a steady beat. Gently opening her eyes to the sunshine through the window. She shifts in the bed and turns her head to look him in the eye giving him a small, yet reassuring, smile. Gently he places a kiss upon her lips and they both know things are going to get better again. He can see the fight in her eyes, and she is not giving up so easily.
This painting is a donation to the RI Food Bank Auction, which has a Cupcake theme. I had a little inventory problem, in that my female cat, Isabelle, is driving insane by the smell of chocolate, in any form. And she will risk life and limb to get some. So the first day when I turned my back she ate the other chocolate cupcake (I painted them from top row to bottom row). So for the second row I had to buy more - and I put the pieces I wasn't painting in a zip lock bag. Left it on the counter and overnight she ate the cupcakes, and the plastic bag as well. The last day in desperation I was buying all the cupcakes on the shelf, just in case they didn't get stocked up and just in case Isabelle somehow could reach the NEW baggie, which I nailed to the top part of the cabinet.
This book is a prime example of why indie publishing is a boon for authors and readers. It’s a dark, richly layered story with complex, tormented characters that are worth the reader’s time to explore, but it doesn’t fit the mainstream publishing mold. Intrigued? Read on.
1) Find a good card. The plastic coated ones work best.
2)Marcus Makavellian’s International Order at the New Red Lion
Let's see what the design team has in store....
A big bull elk did show himself, but stood about 60 or 70 yards out. Ron wanted it to come in to at least 30 to 40 yards. But, just when Ron Jr. thought his buggling efforts were going to pay off, the big elk jolted and took off into the forest. After more than 30 minutes of work calling him in, Ron Jr. was frustrated.
I mentioned last week that my family was in town, and I had the best time catching up with them after work for dinners and wine. One of the first nights they were here Stephen and I met them out on the beach for wine and cheese at sunset. This time of year, you are allowed to drive on the beach if you have a pass, which makes it really easy to head out for a little impromptu date instead of trudging through the sand out there.
The LORD tests the righteous, but his soul hates the wicked and the one who loves violence.
Hopes fade
“Umm… Yeah.” I said looking at my watch, clearly nervous.
Running around outside after many hours stuck in my carseat and stroller while mommy and great grandma shopped:
i spend more on foundation - it's what you're going to wear every time you go out
I'm am a bit gutted as I could have made my Totally Tilda DT card after all!
I am still in the running for the Salford Book Award with The Dead of Winter and I very much hope that it survives onto the shortlist for the Carnegie Medal. The Dead of Winter is part of a Kindle promotion on Amazon a the moment and it has been fun to see it sitting at No. 1 on the horror listings in Children's Books.
There are two desserts that I’m sort of obsessed with, though I rarely eat them: upside down cake and bread pudding.
Angel Fire is being published by Usborne on the 1st of October.
Thank you again to all! Hugs, Ara
wait-
1,000 stills can be found in this illustrated book making it the ultimate cinephile's delight (that would be me). The book traces the evolution of cinema from the Golden Age to film noir to 3-D and films of every genre. Can't wait to order here on Amazon.
John the Baptist got his moniker because he was in the business of baptizing, but he was extremely leery of baptizing Jesus, the Lamb of God.
My prayer journal consists of 3 basic sections -- Adoration, Agreement, and Asking. Each section has categories within it.
how do you workout/walk in jeans? that's too constricting. maybe you should try something w/ a little more leg room. :) - shandra
Tomorrow is our breastfeeding course and I think Tyler is going to try and stick-it-out and attend with me, although he’ll have been up all night with work. What a good daddy!
and the technology that binds them, we influence customer behavior across the spectrum of
Abigail is enthralled and obsessed with her brothers -- both of them. The boys, likewise, absolutely love her. Elijah can get a little too eager to help her sometimes and be a bit on the "clumsy" side with her -- but his intentions are always good. He also took a little longer to get really interested in her. Isaac has been fascinated with her since she joined us, however, and is incredibly soft and gentle with her. They both love to hold her (with help of course) and bring things to her and share with her. Isaac has incredible patience for her and really "gets" that she needs him.
Indeed, Brodsky noted that, because the stadium would produce relatively few jobs, NYC IDA officials had to get a mayoral waiver to move the project along. (He said there’d be 140 permanent jobs; the Yankees now say 1000. Pinsky said figures in Juan Gonzalez's New York Daily News column yesterday were premature.)
Inspired by my Grandma's talent for crafts, I've always loved to create in some form or another. I've been a scrapbooker forever,lol. Even as a child I would take photos and write stories about them. I've been scrapbooking as we know it today for about 15 years. Although in the early days all we had were stickers! My style has changed over that time and with so many influences and fabulous products. Today, I guess I have two distinctly different styles Storybook/whimsical style usually in 3d, where I love to extend the photo and create a scene. I also like to create in a Shabby/arty/, sometimes messy kind of style. lol.
I will finish this piece with an extract from the back cover of one of Maverick House Publishers forthcoming titles this year, A Shattered Youth by Savathy Kim.
Well that was the thinking that led our good mate and Sell! Sell! co-conspirator Matt Janes to set up a new site called Doing Something. The idea is to put the fun back into meeting people. It helps you meet interesting people (like you), and find and choose fun things to do together. The idea being that doing something is fun, takes the pressure off the situation, and makes it easy to be yourselves. Rather than sitting in a pub examining each other's family history or personality defects.
I'm not going to go into the myriad characteristics of each character. Instead, I want to ask this question:
I promised some Gene Vincent so here is an uncharacteristic choice for me, Gene singing The Day The World Turned Blue featuring some cool footage of Gene arriving in London in 1969. He would be dead two years later.
After those few points of business, we got to the tastings:
Semiconductors (US class 438) -- 2.7%
A HUGE thank you to Monica for opening up your home to me and being so kind, and for sharing your home with all my readers!
Oh yah, my shepherd’s pie today had some chili pepper flakes thrown in. Really, I say add whatever you want to the meat. Thyme, tobasco sauce, Worcestshire sauce, yum…I don’t buy horseradish but I hear that’s good too! And mashed potatoes? Add whatever dairy you have in the fridge. Today I used half and half cream, but usually all I have is milk and butter. Someone I know uses cream cheese, others use sour cream…be creative =) Garlic is amazing too.
So having made a declaration that I probably no longer know what I am writing about, I will continue regardless, otherwise this post would be pointless.
49th Ave & Arbutus – 8:32am
I said: “Because it’s for narcissistic clowns.”
Ireland joined what has evolved into the European Union in 1973. As an institution the European Union is far from perfect. It is complex. It has evolved from an initial six countries to the current membership of twenty seven. It is unique. Most of the countries of Europe, including traditional enemies, have come together to form a multinational community of nations. The EU has developed a common currency, the Euro. A European Parliament has powers of approval of the EU budget.
I found this reassuring. Just to know they had a plan and that they would deliver my baby at 30 weeks before they'd let me go home if something was really wonky and the baby could be in danger. I mean, that's why we were there. To have lots of eyes on the Deuce.
“I don’t understand why we have to take the boys with us,” Zofia began whining in German. “Girls are always more useful during wartime. They’re not going to get drafted or be suspected of being circumcised or just get in the way. Why can’t we just leave these three behind in the train station and let them fend for themselves?”
Jim Gottstein of PsychRightsJim Gottstein, Esq., founder and president of the Alaska-based Law Project for Psychiatric Rights (PsychRights), will cross the country to speak. “The public mental health system is creating a huge class of chronic mental patients through forcing them to take ineffective yet extremely harmful drugs. As the APA gets ready to do even more harm with its proposed expansion of what constitutes mental illness, I want to be there in person to participate in the protest.”
Being forced outside was unforgivable. However, there was someone who made it all better for me. Her name was Amanda. She was chill. She was like me. Out of shape, nearly blind, and as nerdy as ketchup is red. I’d see her read comics she brought with her, and I’d share some conversation with her.
style.
It certainly looks like David Haye punched Dereck Chisora whilst holding a bottle. That doesn't necessarily mean that he hit him *with* the bottle, but it's a bit of a no no to say the least. All the same, the authorities will be unlikely to let Chisora off for responding with threats to shoot David Haye. "I am going to shoot David Haye" is what he actually said. I don't think there's much wiggle room on that.
Can you imagine what it would be like for me to take my young children to the opera house? Do you think they would enjoy it? Do you think they would feel comfortable in those surroundings, comfortable with behaving according to the expected rules? I have high expectations for my children and I like to think that they're rather well-behaved, but I'm not blinded by that satisfaction--my kids would hate going to the opera.
Anyway that’s it, that’s my rant… Practice the good. Look for the good. Thank the good. Pray for good.
For initial clarification, Miike Snow is the collective name of the band and not one of the actual musicians on stage. The group started as an side project collaboration between two established Swedish producers and an American songwriter when they met between jobs. Their colorful, synth-laden songs on their eponymous 2010 debut album became a surprise hit and propelled the band to a lengthy, successful world tour right from the start of their existence. They just released their second album, Happy to You, last month, and Miike Snow is back on the road performing their highly danceable, rhythm heavy tunes, complemented by a remarkably visually engaging stage show.
The approval is provided on the risk profile presented to the President. Any additional risks are to be brought back to the President for his consideration. The direction is to go in and get bin Laden and if he is not there, to get out.’
Bernadette helped Matilda turn sideways, slowly shimmied herself in front of her seat and relied to heavily on Bernadette’s good and helpful sense of obliged corporate duty as the bus driver’s impatience prompted her to prematurely let go of her momentary charges arm. Mattie dropped like lead mounted on fragile hips. “Ooops” said Bernadette with the punctuated plop of and old woman falling backward into her seat, lose skin and crackling joints between brittle bones
Because of rejection, I took a step back and was more determined than ever to find out what was wrong. Combining the advice I received from agents, I knew it was a pacing thing. I think three whole books were shoved into one, and I needed to learn how to space things out. How to focus on character. Not be so plot driven. It's not just about being a good writer. There are soooo many other factors that make a story exceptional.
Hell, no! I'm a grown-up. It's up to me to weigh what's been offered and make my own choices. I reserve the right to enjoy and/or employ cyberspace to whatever extent works best for me, along with the right to use real paper. Why? Because at this moment I can reach across my desk and pick up a book that was published in 1884, and it still works. Nobody had to take any particular pains to preserve it, and I don't need anything but daylight to be able to use it. Am I glad there's a copy of it in cyberspace? Yes, of course I am, that's how I discovered it and decided I wanted the real thing. And, yippee!, I was able to order the real thing for $25 and about five minutes of my time online, thanks to technology. Yep, technology is great. But am I gonna digitize everything in triplicate, pay to store it in cyberspace until I die or run out of money, and replace it triennially in case it's deteriorating?
the book is certainly full of sage advice and lessons to ponder. For example this famous exchange with the Cheshire Cat:
I haven't posted about this yet, but I got some bad news the other day. If you remember, my step sister was matched with a birth mother. I was so excited for her. The birth mother was due mid-November, went a bit overdue... well in the end, after delivery, the birth mother decided to parent the child after all. I am just devastated for my step sister. Right around Thanksgiving on top of everything. She has a wonderful attitude about it, but she's still heart broken and my thoughts are with her. I'm letting her decide when/if she can talk to me, because right now she doesn't want to talk about it and I know me being pregnant may be hard for her. But, it's so difficult to see her struggle so much, to get the nursery ready, how excited they were, and now they're back to waiting... I know that there is a baby out there for them, and it's just a matter of time, but I also know that's of little consequence when you're hurting like that. It's just so unfair.
I was constantly giving, giving, giving and he was constantly taking, taking and taking and I literally at the end of the relationship so drained and so annoyed and mad at myself that I allowed myself to get used because he got everything he wanted and keep it pushing. So I don’t want that to happen to you guys.
It's hot @ 10:55 am...Santa Fe here we come!
The chiptune scene would arguably not be the force it is today without the work of two European college students in the late ‘90s and early 2000s. Oliver Wittchow created Nanoloop, one of the first sequencers for the Game Boy, as a final project for his Bachelor’s degree at Hamburg Fine Arts University in 1998. He had played around with a program called FastTracker, creating but never finishing any tracks, and wanted to create an interface-oriented program as an outlet for that kind of casual musical curiosity.
I feel very lucky to partake of this evolutionary jump with all of y'all here in the timeless wormhole of space we have co-created. Cheers!
In about twenty minutes she turned off the burners. She fished the carrots
There are two issues at play here. First of all, the rampant homophobia needs to fucking stop. It's stupid, it's intolerant, and it's the modern day equivalent of hating Black people. Everyone, not just football players, needs to calm the fuck down. Secondly, there is nothing gay about ass-smacking and the tight pants. That is the epitome of manliness. It's the setting that defines the intent of the smack. In a bar or club, smacking another man's ass is totally gay. It's about 150 seconds away from blowing some dude in the restroom of the place. But in a sporting arena, it is not only acceptable, but encouraged. I mean, every NFL play begins with the QB attempting to give the center an enema, and you think the ass-smacking is gay? No.
This lack of logic isn’t all bad. Sometimes it creates instances of irony in action. A favourite one is the preponderance of ‘no smoking’ signs in most restaurants. Very often these signs will be set directly above an ashtray, complete with smouldering cigarette ash falling from the hand of a customer as he cheerfully puffs away. It’s a joyful experience to see laws that are so rigourously enforced back home flouted by groups of policemen on their lunch break. It’s mostly funny due to the fact that while smoking in restaurants is illegal no one cares. However, the financial penalties for not having the signs themselves are enforced. Which must make for an interesting dilemma in the minds of hungry police cigarette smokers.
My entree was salmon and scallop over Asian noodles. This is no longer in their menu as I had to check the menu online to make sure I was getting the prices correctly. If I'm not mistaken this was around $24-26. My husband's dinner was the special of the night and my little point and shoot couldn't handle the lowlights so no good photos of his meal.
I love it.
The 2008 vintage is available from The Good Wine Shop @ £19.50 a bottle.
gettin jiggy with it...will smith
Help With What is Currently Happening
Remodeling’s2011-12 Cost vs. Value Report ©2011 by Hanley Wood, LLC. Republication or redissemination of the Report is expressly prohibited without written permission of Hanley Wood, LLC.“Cost vs. Value” is a registered trademark of Hanley Wood, LLC.Visit www.costvsvalue.com for information on all 35 projects. There, you can also download a free PDF providing information on average cost and resale value nationally, regionally, and in a specific market. Estimates for construction costs were compiled by HomeTech Publishing.
and falling over something,
I still can’t say much about it but I do love the citrus-y smell.
“We are hoping that it will be bring in upwards of $150,000. That goes a long way for us to spay and neuter animals, provide educational programs to schools, as well as do extras and enrichment for the animals who are homeless here at the Louisiana SPCA,” Zorrilla said.
The one in Galveston. I was in college, and my mom, stepdad, and aunt, uncle, spouses and cousins all rented a place near the beach. We had shrimp instead of turkey.
So, today is one of those days where my ovaries have boarded up shop and are hibernating until this child is a little more under control. And Momma is in desperate need of some delicious wine and perhaps a brownie.
Finally after two long hours, a juice box, a full sippy cup, and some cereal - it happened.
Preheat oven to 320 degrees. Spread the walnut halves on a rimmed baking sheet and toast in the oven for 7-10 minutes, just until they are golden and fragrant. Let walnuts cool slightly, then coarsely chop. Line a baking sheet with parchment paper. In a large bowl, whisk the confectioners’ sugar with the cocoa powder and salt. Add the egg whites, vanilla and Tabasco and stir just until the batter is moistened (do not overbeat). Fold in the walnuts and cacao nibs using a spatula. Spoon a heaping teaspoon of batter onto the baking sheets and bake for 15 minutes, until the tops are glossy and lightly cracked. Let cookies cool then peel off the parchment paper.
To think rank is just how it is.
(1) Disciplinary Rule 325 (By failing to pay Dundee United FC, on the day of the above match, monies due under Rule 46(c)(3) and (e) of the Scottish FA’s Competition Rules; being Dundee United FC’s share of receipts for the above match.)
Two adjustable spanners
47 Far From The Madding Crowd – Thomas Hardy*
On one particular snowy, yet not overly cold day, I bundled up Ryan, put him in his penguin sled, and pulled him around our neighborhood while Gizmo walked along side. Here's a self-taken picture of us all. No, I'm not wearing makeup, I am that pasty white, nor was my hair brushed. At least Gizmo loves my appearance and even Ryan looks fond of Giz here.
In many ways bookselling left a lot to be desired. The money was terrible, working with the public was exhausting and the shift system meant that many evenings and weekends were wasted.
And ever since, there’s been a raging debate over the best way to restore growth and prosperity. It’s left a near-constant state of gridlock in Washington, which ignored my campaign promise to be a transformative light-bringer who will end politics as usual.
Here's a couple of them all put together:
If my children won - I'd hand them Lia's Guide, advise them to remain anonymous and suggest they put it all away for their future. But we might have a family holiday first!
Costumes = $60/apiece (and UP) we joke about “a $ a sequin” which isn’t funny but might be true…
Well...that is really all I've got. Nothing exciting.
Meanwhile, Culture Minister Ed Vaizey has announced plans to help the library service take a more central role within local communities.
Terrible months for everyone, but he came through eventually to be compelled to accept that “I had been incorporated into a system that had planned, organised, and carried out the extermination of millions of people. Even if I could not be accused of active complicity” – in that extermination – “there remains to this day a residue that is all too commonly called joint responsibility … What I accepted with the stupid pride of youth “ – his membership of the Waffen SS – “I wanted to conceal after the war out of a recurrent sense of shame. “
Let’s see… Aryan race blah blah blah. Bunch of racist nonsense… Not that we could ever possibly correlate racism with the left, except for the Black Panthers, the KKK, and the American Nazis all pitching in with OWS. Ah here we go. Let’s see how totally not socialist the National Socialists are. Because as I was told, there is soooooooo much evidence.
Effective July 1st, 2011, laws require owners of all existing single family residences to install carbon monoxide detectors.
Questions are now being asked about such huge fees; and about the massive royalty cut they take on top of that (after charges taken by retailers such as Amazon). If you are a newbie, it all sounds a bit much.
It is, in that sense, very much less well equipped to defend its hegemony. History suggests that as that slips away the party will be left increasingly bereft, increasingly unsure of itself and vulnerable to internal collapse.
Then, he needs a favor
I stumbled upon this at the Brattle – I had no idea it existed, let alone that it was only published a few years ago. (I loved the introduction by L’Engle’s granddaughter, Lena Roy, also a writer.) Both the plot (life in a summer stock theatre in the 1940s) and the protagonist – tall, gawky, naive, erudite Elizabeth – mirror L’Engle’s own experience. The supporting characters (especially kindhearted Jane and sweet Ben) are a lot of fun, and there are some bittersweet moments of wisdom and truth and lots of quoting from Shakespeare and Chekhov. Typical L’Engle, in other words – probably best appreciated by those of us who love her already.
8:00 a.m.: ORTM begins its broadcast day with a repeat of last night’s Journal Télévisé, followed by educational and cultural programs.
I happen to be a big fan of Soul Food and Southern cuisine, but I have to admit, I don’t eat much of it around here, save for a few barbecue places that I like to go to (1) (2). Quite frankly I tend to save my Fried Chicken and Smothered Pork Chops, Cornbread and Greens for when I am travelling to places like New Orleans, North Carolina and Atlanta, because there’s not much great Southern food to go around in New York City.
This fortnight at FSC we are asking you to create something in monochrome + one colour!
We definitely need to add Ann Michael’s and Deb Shultz’s ideas about support and having each other’s backs.
22. If you keep a laundry hamper, add some baking soda every day to keep the hamper from smelling between emptyings.
How is this a meditation? Well meditation is the art of focusing your mind on something…and nothing is more about focus then when your mind and your actions are one and directed toward a very clear goal.
In Canada, public pension fund managers are properly compensated and they do not pay external funds for strategies they can replicate in-house. They pay experts to do direct deals in real estate, private equity, infrastructure and they'll have internal teams in public markets to generate absolute returns.
Stock Market (IBEX)
You don’t have a soul. You are a soul. You have a body. C. S. Lewis
Last night saw the official bar launch of EFP11, and Prototype 17, in Brewdog Aberdeen. I missed the the actual anouncement, as I didn't finish work until 8pm, but apparently there was no great speil, more a case of heres the beer, enjoy.
RUBIACEAE – Hamelia patens
Olive oil or vegetable oil, 1 teaspoon
distinctive symbols that have been removed, just those specific symbols. It was
The Walker Family Band Summer Fiddle Camp was without a doubt the best week my kids had all year. The teachers were fantastic. The other families were welcoming and fun. The other kids were music-obsessed, violin-addicted, foot-stomping fiddle-fanatics. It was amazing.
Walk 4.3mph 1 minute, Run 6.3mph 1minute
I want to cycle and be out side and busy, not stuck in a building for 8 hours per day. I want to feel the sun shine, the rain falls and hear the birds sing!
You wear a lot less flashy jewelry when you promote your business ventures than when you’re promoting your music. Is this an effort to project a different image?
It’s a children’s book, previously sold by Toys’R’Us for 2.69, according to the label on the back. Published in 1992, is was adapted from the Universal film “The Wolf Man” by Justine Korman and illustrated by Art Ruiz.
Underlying Assumptions and Appeals
As an aside, Standard happens to be the same L.A.-based architecture firm responsible for many (if not all) of the very spare, art gallery-like retail outlets of t-shirt tycoon James Perse as well as an L-shaped and art gallery-like 1 bedroom and 1.75 bathroom residence in The Birds owned by Mister Perse and currently on the market with a $3,750,000 price tag.
Alshon Jeffery, WR, South Carolina
So don’t make judgments about anyone
Cake:
Starbucks is proud to join other leading Northwest employers in support of Washington State legislation recognizing marriage equality for same-sex couples. Starbucks strives to create a company culture that puts our partners first, and our company has a lengthy history of leading and supporting policies that promote equality and inclusion. This important legislation is aligned with Starbucks business practices and upholds our belief in the equal treatment of partners. It is core to who we are and what we value as a company.
Hope there is something there to suit everyone! I'll leave you to get into the 'spirit' of things and eat, drink and be scary...looking forward to reading your poems, leave a message in the comments box to lead me to your poetry... ; )
I rarely write anything personal about my children because some things should stay private but felt this could help someone or even help me so here is my story.
You're just mutton dressed as lamb, a porno merchant, a weekend tracksuit scally.
More thoughts on Katniss’s thoughts: she had five – Prim, Gale, Peeta, height, and weight. Why did she spend so much thought on the fact that she was “small,” “lightweight,” “oh those people are so heavy they could never climb trees,” etc etc? I’m okay with Katniss being small (although Jennifer Lawrence is 5′ 6″. I didn’t think that constituted as small, but fine.) Yet so many statements about “heavy” people and standing on small branches and hipbones jutting out really made me uncomfortable. When I’m reading a book, I don’t care (or want to know) that this character weighs 129 and the other weighs 120. As trivia, it’s fun to know heights but hearing how short you are every other sentence is just weird. I’m shorter than you are Katniss; get used to it.
Black leather belt - Goodwill
We are the reason, why there is an election, they, the candidates are not the star. We are the principal characters here. Let’s take this privilege, use this right and exercise our duty.
Advice: Same as #3. Additionally, don’t get too involved in analyzing these issues. Examining them too much will simply cycle you back through them over and over again at deeper and deeper levels. Get professional help if you need to and walk through it.
Ishaan Awasthi is an eight-year-old whose world is filled with wonders that no one else seems to appreciate. He just cannot seem to get anything right in class. When he gets into far more trouble than his parents can handle, he is packed off to a boarding school to 'be disciplined'. Things are no different at his new school, and Ishaan has to contend with the added trauma of separation from his family. One day a new art teacher bursts onto the scene, Ram Shankar Nikumbh, who infects the students with joy and optimism. He breaks all the rules of 'how things are done' by asking them to think, dream and imagine, and all the children respond with enthusiasm, all except Ishaan. Nikumbh soon realizes that Ishaan is very unhappy, and he sets out to discover why. With time, patience and care, Nikumbh begins the process of helping Ishaan find himself.
Toonman was going with me
“It’s a fine line to walk. Rather than great thinkers like Thomas Jefferson and Ben Franklin, we’re stuck with the 112th U.S. Congress.” Read more..
-You will get a free TShirt from Beachbody at the end of your program.
here's why i was pondering the 2004 playoff honors cards in the first place - double plays. like rafael furcal
In a DB2 10 environment you have a new choice here: PGSTEAL(NONE). When that option is specified for a buffer pool, here's what happens:
I'm actively fund-raising to finish filming and post production, expanding this 7 minute teaser into a full-fledged 50 minute documentary for US and worldwide television broadcast. If you are an interested funder, foundation officer or know someone who is, please contact me by email. I would like to finish this project before Dec. 21, 2012. Not much time left. :-) “
The system to create unprecedented convenience for new products and services now exists. How these will be used will be a closely watched issue over the next 2 to 3 years because the answer to that question whatever the flow of about $13 trillion every year.
Two weeks later, at a Nov. 11 lunch at Scarpetta in Beverly Hills, they were “making out, acting romantic,” says a source. (Reps for both stars say Diaz and Combs, 42, are “just friends” and meeting to discuss a possible comedy film project.)
4. This quote I read today by Mark Twain: "Most men die by the age of 27. We just don't bury them until they are 72."
Go check it out... and thank you Donna!!!!
You had to write the closing paragraph for a Mills and Boon type novel - the more tongue in cheek the better. I entered - mainly to give our local library something to put in the envelope aside from a sticky lollipop and some fluff. And then promptly forgot all about it.
He moved up the ranks quickly in films like Yoshio Inoue’s KAMIKAZE SQUADRON (1960), and was soon cast second-billed to Ichikawa in Kenji Misumi’s three-part screen adaptation of “Daibosatsu Toge”, SATAN'S SWORD (also made by Kihachi Okamoto as SWORD OF DOOM). The next year, Hongo was the top-billed star of Misumi’s BUDDHA (1961), a 70mm spectacle produced to rival Cecil B. DeMille's THE TEN COMMANDMENTS (1956), in which he was cast as Prince Siddhartha. Several other spectacles followed, such as Shigeo Tanaka’s THE GREAT WALL (1962), as well as playing Sanshiro Sugata in Shunkai Mizuho’s EAGLE OF THE KODOKAN (1964).
The petition has sought a detailed investigation into the procurement of children through extortion, blackmail, threats and through bribery of government officials. It also asks the court to look into what it is calling the inhuman condition of children in various agencies.
Tiranoc chariot (plus lions)
07: Aerosol – A Slow Beginning (03:33)
- Cranberry sauce
This next election is going to be ugly. And to think I used to be a member of the Republican party. How embarrassing.
I would venture that we have not seen this divisiveness since the Civil War. We see throngs of young people gathering in the cities across our nation, protesting the establishment, in the Occupy movement, but they offer little in the way of solution, other than a Marxists state, which we know from history does not, and will not, ever create a utopian society. We see women demanding the right to kill their unborn children on demand. We see our youth piercing, tattooing, and branding their bodies to set them apart from their parents and the establishment. Class warfare has flared up, as it seems to be a crime to succeed in this country and if you do the government is demanding even more of your money. Gun sales have reached record highs as fears of a coming economic collapse continue to grow.
The base of the Alice pendant has a winged clock gear with a bit of bling in the center, and an actual watch is dangled from the bottom. I can almost hear the patter of the White Rabbit's feet as he races away, worrying about being late to meet the duchess, as that is the book illustration this aspect of Alice is taken from. His fear of being late also ties in the clockworks theme quite nicely!
Don’t forget to leave a link to your actual response (so people don’t have to go searching for it) in the comments—or if you prefer, leave your answers in the comments themselves!
Second swim: 13 lengths
The youth group went on a prayer walk this week. They took their cameras along to take photos of places of desolation and consolation.
The Education and Workforce Committee has no action on Hunter’s bill planned at this time, according to committee spokesman Brian Newell.
Lee Seung Gi, on the other hand, continues to showcase a similar line of characters with each piece. Hwang Tae Ja ofFamous Princesses, Cha Dae Woong of My Girlfriend is a Gumiho and Lee Jae Ha of The King 2Hearts all seem to be too similar. This is the limit that Lee Seung Gi must overcome.
Using his own blood, Novatka wrote on the outside of the Jeep, “Fear God,” the affidavit states.
“Somebody’s looking hot!”, mocked my date for the night as he opened the car for me. I was so uncomfortable walking in it, I was pretty sure i was looking like a dork. “Its embarassing already”, I snapped. He just smiled, making me feel guity for being bitchy, again! “You’re looking smart in the tuxedo!”, I added. And I wasn’t even being polite. He really did look handsome and mature. Unlike the large T-shirts he wore the first time. “I like dressing up”, he said and then winked.
So Penn State had no choice but to do the only thing they could do, they had to fire Paterno after 46 extraordinary years as the university’s head coach. It will not, by any means, make up for what happened to these now men earlier in their lives.Their lives will always be marred by what happened to them at the hands of a Penn State University coach.
It’s been another few days like this… That’s unfortunate for coworkers, friends and family because I am all ” I love running, Running is great… Butterflies and unicorns and laa la la laa RUNNINGGGG”
So once again we found ourselves at Bromsgrove station, waiting for the southbound London/Midland train, it was quite odd really, as each of our days out by train recently (bar one) had been from this station down the same line, each time we’d ended up a station further down the track, today was Hereford (at this rate we’ll be doing Cornwall by September) where we changed onto an Arriva Wales train heading for Ludlow and beyond.
Riding the entire length of the Katy Trail (St. Charles to Clinton), which parallels I-70, further magnifies the differences of the Show-Me-State.
Adding to the chaos of rapid traffic was e-mail overload. I don’t think I’ve ever seen that many e-mail alerts in all my life! Having everything funneled through your e-mail is fine when there’s 7 or 8 comments on a post and a couple likes, but several hundred stuffed my mailbox faster than I could process them! It was insane, yet so much fun!
Which leads me onto Luis Suarez. As most of you are probably aware, Luis has managed to get himself onto the bad side of the Football Association by allegedly making a racist comment towards Patrice Evra. Liverpool Football Club have, quite rightly, backed their player. I say quite rightly because it is a basic tenet of the Law in the is country that you are innocent until proven guilty.
For each tree planted:
Group Dynamics
Bake at 350° for 10 to 12 minutes or until lightly browned. Remove to a wire rack, and let cool 30 minutes or until completely cool.
(1) Should be mandatory for all citizens.
Recently, a possible solution to the shark fin problem has been proposed, the use of farmed tilapia fins from Taiwan. Taiwan tilapia, originally called Wuguo Fish after the two men, Wu Zhen-hui and Guo Qi-zhang, who introduced the fish to Taiwan in 1946, is said to possess the same appearance and texture as a shark fin, and thus would make a good substitution in the soup. The fins must be served shredded though because they are much smaller than the usual shark fins. Tilapia is much cheaper and a far more sustainable choice than shark fin. But will it serve as a proper replacement?
A Mass. Colonel Promoted ~ The brave and noble Col. Charles Devens, Jr., of Worcester who fought so bravely at Ball’s Bluff, then Col. of the Mass. 15th Reg. has been promoted to be a Brigadier General. The Springfield Republican pays him the following deserved compliment:
01 Love Will Tear Us Apart
He sighed. His face looked grim. ‘All the time.’ He wrapped his hand around my shoulder and steered me away, past the sinkhole.
* Do you plan your stories in advance, or do they happen on the page? And do you do much research?
The Next Step(s):
Pray for the Fulani to find Isa (Jesus) of the Koran of increasing interest, someone to study. Pray for their curiosity to be satisfied.
It’s amazing what a pop boy band song can get you thinking about during your morning workout.
The book taunted me from the grass. “I have the rest of the story and you don’t.”
A long-standing and very prominent Watchtower teaching is the belief that in 1914 a special period of time Jesus called the “Gentile Times” ended, the “last days” began, and Christ began to rule over the whole earth for the first time since his resurrection and ascension to heaven. Immediately prior to that time, Jesus, in anticipation of his imminent reign, began inspecting the religious organizations of the world to see which one would be his official representative when he began to rule. He examined the teachings of all religions on earth claiming to be Christian and decided that the most “faithful” one (meaning the one with the most correct interpretation of the Bible) was the small group of Charles Russell’s followers, later to be known as Jehovah’s Witnesses. As a result, Watchtower publications teach, shortly after 1914 Jesus committed all the interests of his kingdom into their hands, and they became his only approved channel of communication between God and mankind.
600 meters in 3:10 = 8:30/mile = 7.1 mph
Most of us are familiar with the common adage: “Ignorance is bliss”. And while this might apply to some circumstances, in others, ignorance could be the very thing creating some of the world’s most pertinent issues.
Actually it's not a big deal here. We live in the North West, not too many miles from Manchester, so we're well used to this kind of weather. Whilst the country further south are despairing of the rain and wind, and banging on about how there could be droughts, we're just pulling on our wellies and getting on with it, it's nothing new here :) Mind you, I wasn't brave enough to go outside and take a snap so this was the view from our bedroom window instead! The trees are loving it I think, look at all that lovely blossom.
"...like web-footed fascists with mad little eyes!"
Is It Possible To See It All – John Phillips is Canadian. Do I need to say more? Seriously, he’s another blogger who appreciates music and has introduced me to some great Canadian bands. Lately, he’s been traveling through parts of the west, most recently, Coeur d’Alene, Idaho, and documenting the important sights like the Wolf Lodge Inn. I should also mention that John is very compulsive about sticking to his writing schedule, I’d even call him a stickler. You won’t catch him dozing off at the wheel!
Chairman: "I wish we'd called the new house The Boat House, rather than Barnfield."
It helps us return to the acme of our own happiness.
where I recalled seeing a little sushi bar, tucked away, almost out of
A cause of action is defined as:
Remove form oven, brush top with butter, and let cool 30 minutes. Dust with confectioner's sugar.
In all of our efforts
On my first day with the bike, I stopped at a mosque for tea. Parked the bike.
I hope you had a wonderful Easter Sunday! I have one *Berry* sweet card to show you for Kitchen Sink Monday!!
Nothing can beat, when you decide to come back again.
Identification Larger, with a longer longest tail than a mountain pigeon; blue-gray on the higher parts with distinct blackish grey trip feathers; a blackish grey longest tail with a wide, light grey terminal band. Paler-gray greater coverts show as a wide side red stripe when in trip. Mature male: grey on the head, and chest tinged pinkish; small bright half-collar across the higher back neck, with iridescent greenish below. Eye light yellow; small orbital skin purplish; expenses yellow-colored with a dark-colored tip; and toes yellow-colored. Mature female: like using its, but lilac color somewhat demure, and with less iridescent green. Juvenile: paler than the adults, with small white edges on the chest and coverts; half-collar reduced or hidden.
First lets put them in context and go back in time to 1995. So come with me dear reader, here take my hand and let's do that swishy thing with your hands and make a sound effect noise.
Especially the past six months since I lost my mom,
If you are in the market for a pair of coconut boobs and you desire to google your way across the interwebs to find said “coconut boobs”, it has become apparent to me that I must come up very high in the results.
That is where they had our
“Umm.”
(4) Once payment has been finalized, THIS IS IMPORTANT - please drop us an email (at info@jennysunphotography.com with a printscreen of the payment confirmation and the following details: your first name, your surname, your studio name, your studio website, phone number, and email address.
Be sure to visit Gaiam online at
Can’t omit the Beltway sniper attacks in October 2002. For weeks, John Allen Muhammad, a Black Muslim, and his accomplice, Lee Boyd Malvo, were driving around Maryland and Virginia, shooting up whitey, with a brown immigrant for target practice now and then, resulting in ten kills and three critical injuries. For weeks, the authorities were looking for white supremacist killers, while the targeted murders of kuffar were going on.
On day 3 they learnt the colours and pets, and in pairs created a short animation about animals – you can see all their efforts below.
Here are three ways it made a great difference in my ease of research:
em: good, he probably hoped it would burn down so he could not work there anymore
In the moonlit sky
These past 2 weekends, I have taken the free yoga classes hosted at this trendy yoga clothing boutique. I never went inside before because I knew I couldn't afford anything. It's actually a lovely space. They have great teachers from Lucky Lotus this month. A person told me they host events all year, not just April! Next month they will have pilates! They never pressure you to purchase their items, and the employees are very nice.
Unresolved blast from the past
Noteworthy: Raise your hands if you remember the 1 hit masterpiece he threw in game 2 of the 1999 LDS against Houston. The only hit was a HR by the late Ken Caminiti. Millwood then came out in game 3 and threw a scoreless 12th inning to earn the save.
Nonwoven fabrics are broadly defined as sheet or web structures bonded together by entangling fiber or filaments (and by perforating films) mechanically, thermally or chemically. They are flat, porous sheets that are made directly from separate fibers or from molten plastic or plastic film. They are not made by weaving or knitting and do not require converting the fibers to yarn.
8:00 p.m.-- Get home, write post, go to bed too late.
TWIG THE WONDERKID AND DJ BASTARD SPIN A SEXY SELECTION OF ELECTRO, NEW-WAVE, INDIE, AND RAWK HOSTED BY ZERO ZUMBRUN AND FRIENDS
Finally, rather than posting a video today, I would instead like to provide a service for all you Muriel voters who are Netflix members. As Muriels season heats up, it can sometimes be hard to get your grubby paws on all the movies you’d like to see from the past year. Therefore, it might interest you that a decent number of this year’s Muriel-eligible titles are available to stream on Netflix. Sure, the quality might not be as good as a DVD, but it’s better than nothing, especially considering that some of these are not yet on DVD. Besides, it’s only going to get better, right? Anyway, the list:
He receives these accommodations absolutely free.
If you could have dinner with any author, who would it be and what would you ask him/her? Julie Lessman because when I read her work I just feel like we could be kindred spirits.
It takes about 30 minutes total, including prep time.
I woke up this morning with this song reverberating through my head. It’s a beautiful song, and the dance routine so elegant. Audrey Hepburn has such poise. However, I do object to her face being called “funny”, as she’s absolutely beautiful, but the sentiments of the song are wise words. It is more important to have a personality and character behind one’s appearance than to always concentrate on the appearance itself.
All I can do is love them, teach them, and be a woman of faith myself.
I made these cupcakes for a luncheon honoring a group of hard-working volunteers. The hostess of the event had her home decorated in an Autumn theme, so I figured cupcakes inspired by fall flavors were the way to go. And what says fall like apples?
The opening of GPH reads very much like the beginning of any hero's adventure (Joseph Campbell anyone? PKD knew his work well): the protagonist struggles with a mundane and unsatisfying existence - think Luke Skywalker under uncle Owen's thumb. The Glimmung seems to be offering exactly what Fernwright is looking for. Isn't that usually a bad thing in literature?
For this outfit I made the shoes to main point. It's a suede heel from Madewell that you can wear for different occasions. The dress is subtle; it's not too revealing but it also hugs you in the right places. The heart prints make the dress a little more sweeter and fun too. Add a blazer or a shawl above the dress, a few pieces of gold jewelry and you're good to go for the night.
Ok so I had a thought today (4/27) and figured I would write a few haikus about a man who has lost hope of LOVE, Life and everything else…
Crime, and its consequential chaos, has created for the Marxist-Communist ANC a condition of total war…. a cultural space in which genocide could occur.
Both of these cards are made using the same fold, a double easel, one section square and twisted the other a rectangle and normal.
SCC: First you were a kind of father-figure to Seth, and now, in Bloodstone, you’re doing it all over again with Finn. You and Eili have had no children of your own (so far). I know it’s hard for the Sithe to have kids and that they’re incredibly important to you—so what would be the most vital piece of advice you’d want to pass on to your own bairn?
OUR TIMES SNEAK PREVIEW SPECIAL LABOUR DAY ISSUE
later. The man says the most amazing thing about the story is that his wife fell for it.” -Conan O’Brien
II. A Political Miracle (i)
Our waitress also gave us a bowl of rice and beans out of confusion, but who are we to deny a challenge? I took that opportunity to try their two sauces: a hot and spicy chipotle sauce and a puréed cold vegetable sauce. The red sauce was smoky and had a really good heat behind it–definitely not subtle. The green (vegetable) sauce was chunky, but not too thick, and had lots of fresh flavor playing off the cilantro. Kristien went wild with these sauces in her dish (which she absolutely loved): the Typico Breakfast. In Costa Rica, they call this Tico Pinto. As she dug her way through the eggs, over easy, beans and rice, and plantains we talked about how much we missed being in Costa Rica and how much we loved the food. Valencia, though, took us back.
This is a joint stitch with some other members of my Thursday stitching group. It will be a surprise gift for a friend. We were each to add something that represented us. Mine is from LHN - The Nutcracker. Isn't just too cute.
So, I became obsessed with this television show on Planet Green called The Fabulous Beekman Boys about two city slickers move out to (the absolutely picturesque) Beekman Mansion. Thy have goats, a Llama, and a farmer named John. Seriously, thank goodness for Farmer John.
Do you agree or disagree with the decisions tonight? Not as rough as last night. Still reeling from Jesse’s elimination, but I’m almost over it. Haha
I won’t lie, I’m falling hard
So, while being disappointed that it lacks provisions for a robust public option, I applaud the reforms that will end some of the most egregious practices of the private health insurance industry. I look forward to a time when I no longer have to worry about my family being denied coverage for pre-existing illness and no longer have to worry about having my insurance canceled or run out when I need it the most.
No, not something involving Jimmy Carter.
Yes well.
“But why? I wannnttt to come with you.”
